Your
mobility App
With shared vehicles or public transport,
go places with URBI
Everything at a tap's distance
Oh my! How do I choose today?
Our map lets you discover all of your city's mobility solutions around you. Simply and reliably.
One registration for all
Yes, exactly. Verify your identity and payment method once and for all, and you can rent some services directly with URBI! Look for the pink-beam pins!**
**Available just in some cities and for some providers.
Look for the pink-beam pins on the map.
City to city mobility
Are you ready to book your train or ferry ticket? You can purchase and manage your
Trenitalia, Italo, Moby Lines and Caronte* ticket
directly in URBI. And don't worry about getting to an airport, we have got you covered with airport shuttles!
*Available at the moment just for Italy, soon for other countries!
Everything under control
Keep track of your expences made on URBI: purchased tickets, voucher or any trip in shared mobility, all in one place.
Find us easily
Italy
Germany
Spain
Austria
portugal
...
Do you wish to use URBI in your city?
Contact us
Cancel
Cancel
Contact us
Submit
Cancel
Cancel
SIGN UP TO OUR NEWSLETTER
Receive news about our offers, the world of mobility and crazy news and features!
Subscribe now
Cancel
Cancel
NEWSLETTER
FAQ
EN > IT
CONTACT
Work with us
There aren't any open position right now.
Do you want to write us something anyway? Let's chat!
Contact us
FAQ
WHAT DO YOU NEED TO KNOW ABOUT?
SIGN UP AND LOGIN
MOBILITY SERVICES
HOW TO: APP FEATURES
PAYMENTS & INVOICING
MOBILITY VOUCHERS & OFFERS
Sign up and login
How can i register to
URBI
?
It's not mandatory to register to URBI to use the map and its features. We ask you to verify your phone number for any purchase you wish to do in the App.
Once i enter URBI, am I registered to all the sharing services?
URBI has superpowers!
Some services can be rented directly on URBI without a need of registering on the official App, but not all yet.
What you have to do:
- verify your phone number on URBI
- verify your identity with your driving license
- add a valid payment method and invoicing details.
This is all. The you are ready to go!
You can easily understand which are the services you can rent in map: find the pink-beam pins.
Once i enter my phone number to verify it, i don't receive the code. What should i do?
Sometimes there might be some glitches or slow system problems. Sometimes it depends on the telephone company. We suggest you to try again and be patient :) . If that doesn’t solve it, contact us,
contact us
.
mobility
Which mobility services can i find on URBI?
You can find most of the
sharing mobility services
available in the city, the
local public transport
- with timetable, stops and delays -, and
taxis or ride sharing
.
By it's not all! In Italy you can purchase your train ticket for your extraurban trips with
Trenitalia or Italo; the airport shuttle ticket with Terravision; the ferry ticket of Moby Lines
.
We try to keep track of all the providers available in the cities, but if we have forgotten some,
please write us
, we will do our best to work on that!
Do you support
BIKE SHARING
?
Yes we do, both stationary and free floating, find the dedicated pins on the map. For the stationary services, tapping on the pin on the map shows you the bike/stalls availability.
Do you support the
E-SCOOTER SHARING
?
Yes we do, and some can also be rented on URBI. To find out more, read few q/a above.
What is the difference between passenger types?
Each transport operator has its own rules for defining passenger age categories.
When booking with URBI, you select a generic passenger category that might be updated in the purchase process based on the age entered in the personal data, ensuring the correct price and appropriate ticket type.
For instance: if you select the “child” category for a 13 year old passenger traveling with Terravision, and the “adult” category is displayed at the end of the booking process, it is correct. Terravision applies the adult fare to passengers over 12 years old.
Below the details for each operator:
Do you support the
TAXIS
?
YES! Tap the Taxi Icon Button in the home panel, enter your correct pickup and destination address, and payment details. We will guide you step by step during your trip about the reservation status. Forget about cash for the payment, it's all processed in App.
At the moment it's possible just in few cities, if yours is not supported we show you the taxi stands and let you call one.
Accepted payments methods: Visa, MasterCard, American Express, Diners Club, JCB and Discover
How do i pay my
TAXI
with URBI?
During your reservation process you are asked to add a payment method, which will be used for your ride.
Taxi providers don't always have the same payment process.
WETAXI
The transaction will be automatically processed
, so you won't have to do anything with the App. At the end of your ride, you will be notified about the accredited transaction on the payment method chosen during reservation.
Why does the App shows a 'maximum' price estimation?
The estimated fare for WeTaxi given during the taxi research is the maximum price you are going to pay. If the cost indicated by the taximeter is lower than the one calculated in App, you will pay the lower amount of the two. Similarly, if the amount of the taximeter at the end of your ride is higher than the estimation, you will pay just the amount calculated by the App.
how to
How does the RADAR work and how do I activate it?
If you can’t find a vehicle near you, don’t worry! You can activate the Radar feature which will advise you, with a jingle, when a car is free within the distance you have selected. To activate it, press on the point of interest on the map for a few seconds or select the feature directly from the menu/map settings. If you enable the feature “Reserve it for me” we will reserve for you the first vehicle that gets free. You are going to be the fastest!
If I start a rental with URBI, can i also use the official provider app to continue with it?
If you have an ongoing rental on URBI you can't end it on the official App.
The vehicle doesn't open or respond, what should i do?
Sometimes technical problems might happen. If you are sure you have done everything correctly, contact the provider: you can find the contact number in the selected vehicle detail on the map.
Trips and purchases history
You will find also all the purchases and rentals made just on URBI.
Does URBI work OFFLINE?
If you don’t have an internet connection on your phone and it’s not possible for you to see the availability of the free floating vehicles or to book a vehicle. But, you can still see the stationary services location.
ev charging
How does the service "CHARGE YOUR VEHICLE" work?
Il servizio ti permette di ricaricare il tuo veicolo elettrico prenotando e pagando direttamente dalla tua App.
Seleziona il servizio Ricarica Elettrica, geolocalizzati e visualizza nella mappa la stazione di ricarica disponibile più vicina.
Raggiunta la stazione, scegli un connettore tra quelli disponibili e clicca su “Ricarica”. Appena terminato il rifornimento, riceverai una notifica.
Per terminare prima del pieno e liberare la presa, basta premere il pulsante in App e staccare il cavo dalla colonnina e poi dall’auto.
How can I start the charge?
Assicurati di avere con te il cavo per la ricarica.
Raggiunta la stazione di servizio, seleziona la presa tra quelle disponibili in App cliccando su “Scegli connettore”.
La presa si sbloccherà e avrai pochi minuti di tempo per collegare il cavo alla colonnina e iniziare la sessione di ricarica. Ricordati di collegare sempre prima il cavo al tuo veicolo e dopo alla presa della colonnina.
How can I end the charge?
Se vuoi terminare prima di completare l’intera sessione, ti basta tappare su “Termina ricarica” in App. Bloccata la ricarica, estrai prima il cavo dalla presa della stazione e dopo dal tuo veicolo. Ricordati di interrompere sempre prima in App la sessione per sbloccare il cavo dalla presa.
I tapped "End charge" but the charge seems to be still active.
Se hai terminato la ricarica e staccato il cavo, ma in App la ricarica risulta ancora attiva, contattaci via email a
supporto@urbi.co
inviando il numero di telefono verificato su URBI
. Verificheremo immediatamente cosa è successo.
The charge is ended but I can't unplug the cable from the station. What should I do?
Se il cavo è scollegato dal veicolo ma resta bloccato alla presa della stazione, riaggancialo nuovamente alla tua auto, riavvia la ricarica e interrompila in App.
Ricordati di estrarre sempre prima il cavo dalla stazione di ricarica e poi dal veicolo.
payments
Which payment methods are supported?
Apple Pay, Google Pay, Mastercard, VISA....
Can i manage my payment details?
Yes, you can add and delete any payment method in the Profile section or in the Shop during purchase.
What is URBI Wallet? How does it work?
If you have credit in your Wallet, it will be automatically applied to your transactions in App. You can obtain credit by redeeming an URBI credit voucher you have received or purchased.
Where is the credit applied:
to all transaction made within URBI App. So purchases in the Shop (voucher, train tickets and airport shuttles) or Taxi Hail in the cities of Milan, Rome and Turin.
I have credit in my Wallet but i am asked to add a payment method during purchase from your Shop. Why?
Adding a personal payment method is necessary in order to limit a possible overspending amount of money that wouldn’t be paid if the transaction value would be higher than the credit left in the Wallet.
For example: if the amount due is 8€ and my Wallet has 3€ left, I will need a credit card to pay the remaining 5€.
Why the credit of my Wallet isn't applied to my sharing rides?
We don't manage any sharing providers. The credit of the Wallet won't be applied for the transaction made on the shared mobility. The credit can be used just for transaction within the URBI App (Shop purchases, train ticket, taxi rides).
I need an invoice
For all transactions made on URBI you will receive an invoice. If you are Italian, you will receive a courtesy invoice by email and the original document in you private area of Agenzia delle Entrate. If you are based in any other country, you will receive the invoice by email.
refund policies
I would like a refund of the voucher purchased on URBI shop
You can ask for a refund within 30 days form purchase and if the voucher hasn't been yet redeemed. Write an email to
support@urbi.co
with the voucher code and the phone number used.
I would like a refund of the train ticket purchased on URBI
You can ask for the refund directly in App. At the bottom of the details of your ticket in App, you find the
Edit trip
button. If the editing is possibile, the button will be active. If Trenitalia gives us the info the it is not possible, we can't do anything about it.
cities
Where can i use URBI? Which cities are supported?
URBI is already available in many cities around Europe and North US. Zoom out the map in the App to discover all of them! You can use URBI to reserve a vehicle and find out the operative services in all the cities we support.
urbi as maas operator
What is MaaS?
MaaS is a complicated name for pinpointing a single digital channel for your commute. URBI is therefore part of the MaaS for Italy project of the Italian Government.
Find more information on the official webpages:
Join the MaaS for Abruzzo
Join the MaaS for Bari
Join the MaaS for Bolzano
Join the MaaS for Campania
Join the MaaS for Emilia Romagna
Join the MaaS for Firenze
Join the MaaS for Piemonte
Join the MaaS for Puglia
Join the MaaS for Torino
Join the MaaS for Veneto
You didn't find any answer to your doubts?
Do you wish to leave us a feedback?
Contact us
TERMS AND CONDITIONS
Terms and Conditions in italian language
Last update: November 27, 2023
Welcome to the world of the URBI application (hereinafter "URBI App" or just "URBI"), owned by the Swiss company URBANnext SA, no. CHE-149.120.999, with registered office in Vicolo de’ Calvi, 2-6830 Chiasso, Switzerland ("URBANnext").
URBANnext, through the secondary office URBI, located in via Luigi Sturzo, 45, 20154, Milan (MI), in compliance with the Regional Law of Lombardy 1st October 2015, no. 27, to provide, among other things, the service of aggregation and provision of services related to the transport of people provided, independently and autonomously, by third-party providers. By accessing URBI through a mobile device or a computer via mobile app and website www.URBI.co (hereinafter, also simply the "Platform"), before proceeding with the registration necessary for the creation of your own URBI Account, the user must confirm that they have read and declare that they accept these rules and conditions ("Rules and Conditions" or also "Agreement") and the information on the processing of personal data under EU Regulation 619/2016 ("GDPR") always available in the reserved area in URBI App in their most updated version (“Privacy Policy”).
1.Definitions
a)
URBI Account:
refers to the account created by the User following the insertion and registration of their data and the chosen payment method (credit card or prepaid card of the User) on the URBI App in order to use the URBI Services.
b)
Affiliation:
refers to the hyperlink redirection on the third-party platform for the purchase at advantageous conditions of services related and/or complementary to Mobility Services.
c)
Urbi App:
Mobile App downloadable from the app store with which it is possible to purchase services related and/or complementary to Mobility Services.
d)
Consumer Code:
refers to Legislative Decree 6 September 2005, no. 206.
e)
Discount Code:
refers to the code that gives the User a promotional percentage discount based on (A) agreements that URBANnext concludes with certain Partners or (B) at the discretion of URBANnext itself in line with its marketing activity towards its actual and potential Users. The Discount Code must be manually entered by the User when paying for the purchase of train, bus, ferry and local public transport tickets, for the purchase of a Mobility Voucher or a Voucher Code. Discount Codes are not cumulative. The Discount Code is valid for the current fiscal year and can be used for the purchase of all Mobility Services, for the purchase of a Mobility Voucher or a Voucher Code, except for special conditions (including, by way of example, the geographical perimeter of use), communicated to the User at the time of purchase or receipt of the Discount Code. Other rules and conditions for the use of the Discount Code will be provided to the User from time to time at the time of recognition of the Discount Code itself.
f)
Voucher Code:
refers to the alphanumeric code corresponding to a gift card that can be associated with the User's URBI Account, of a predetermined amount with which the User can recharge the Wallet. The Voucher Code is valid for the current fiscal year from the date of entry in App URBI and can be used for the purchase of all Mobility Services, except for special conditions (including, by way of example, the geographical perimeter of use), communicated to the User at the time of purchase or receipt of the Voucher Code. After the validity period, unspent amounts in the Wallet will be lost.
g)
Deep Integration:
refers to the technological integration through API (Application Programming Interface) of a Mobility Services Provider referred to in art. 2.1 letter (a) that follows, which allows the User to search, locate, reserve, purchase and use the Mobility Service directly on the URBI App without being redirected to the Provider's platform and therefore without the need for prior registration on the Provider's platform.
h)
Provider:
refers to the company, different from URBANnext, which provides the Mobility Services aggregated on the URBI App by virtue of specific contracts with URBANnext. In particular, the provider of the Electric Charging Service is Telepass S.p.A. The Provider is solely responsible for the quality of the Mobility Service provided as well as the related assistance to the User. On URBI the Provider can also promote the Mobility Services through promotional campaigns with which, with the User's consent and in compliance with current regulations, discounts, gifts etc. are recognized to the User.
i)
Journey Planner:
refers to the operating system offered to Users to suggest intermodal trips from point A to point B. The Journey Planner proposes travel solutions, provided by Providers and/or URBI partners, aggregated and prioritized according to the criterion of convenience and other criteria expressly chosen by the User in APP.
j)
Light Integration:
refers to the technological integration through API (Application Programming Interface) of a Mobility Services Provider referred to in art. 2.1 letter (b) that follows, which allows the User to search and locate a Mobility Service on the URBI App, select it and be redirected to the Provider's platform for the possible reservation, purchase and use of the Mobility Service.
k)
Partner:
refers to the third party, different from the Provider, who offers their employees, customers and/or suppliers Discount Codes to be used on URBI.
l)
Mobility Services:
refer to the services related to the transport of people provided by Providers independently and autonomously from URBANnext, made available from time to time on URBI and individually regulated by the rules and conditions of use made available by individual Providers.
m)
Electric Charging Service:
refers to the service of charging electric vehicles provided by Telepass S.p.A. as an Electric Mobility Provider to the User via the URBI App, subject to the User's acceptance of the Rules and Conditions of the Charging Service provided by Telepass S.p.A., based on the agreements signed with the individual Charging Point Operator.
n)
URBI Services:
refer to (i) the service of aggregation and provision on the URBI App of Mobility Services and the Electric Charging Service, as defined below, provided by URBANnext through URBI, (ii) ancillary services connected to the various functionalities of URBI, where available by virtue of agreements with individual Providers, such as the reservation and payment of the Mobility Service, (iii) the service of distribution of Mobility Vouchers, as defined below, for their use on the platforms of the Providers, as well as (iv) the service of distribution of Voucher Codes, as defined below, for their use on the URBI App, expressly excluding from the definition of "URBI Services" the Mobility Services provided autonomously by individual Providers, as defined below.
o)
User:
refers to the natural person of age greater than fourteen years who, upon registration, accesses the URBI App and/or uses the URBI Services. Individual Mobility Services may be subject to additional minimum age requirements for their use, based on current regulations and the terms and conditions of partners. In this case, Mobility Services will automatically be unavailable for Users not meeting the required conditions.
p)
Wallet:
refers to the virtual piggy bank associated with the User's URBI Account, which, once recharged using the payment method registered on the URBI Account in the "Payment Methods" section or by redeeming a Voucher Code owned by the User, indicates the amount available for use by the User for the purchase of Mobility Services and the Electric Charging Service exclusively through the URBI App. The Wallet takes precedence over other payment methods, such as the User's credit card or prepaid card, as will be specified in art. 8 that follows. The amount available on the Wallet will be valid and usable for a period of 12 (twelve) months, starting from the date of recharge on the Wallet of the aforementioned amount made by the User. After this term, unspent amounts in the Wallet will be lost.
q)
Mobility Voucher:
refers to the alphanumeric code associated with a predetermined amount, purchasable on the URBI App via the Wallet or another payment method among those accepted on URBI. The Mobility Voucher allows the User to use the services related to the transport of people provided by the individual Provider exclusively on the Provider's platform. The Mobility Voucher is valid for the current fiscal year, from the date of entry in App URBI and can be used for the purchase of all Mobility Services, except for special conditions (including, by way of example, the geographical perimeter of use), communicated to the User at the time of purchase or receipt of the Mobility Voucher. After the validity period, unspent amounts in the Wallet will be lost.
2. What is URBI
2.1 URBI is an aggregator of shared Mobility Services that allows the User to plan their trip and perform, comparing a series of Mobility Services, the operations indicated below, in order to reach the desired destination: (a) in case of Light Integration: search and locate the following Mobility Services: train, bus, ferry and local public transport tickets, use of taxis, and be redirected to the Provider's platform to use the chosen Mobility Service through the Provider's platform; (b) in case of Deep Integration: search, locate, reserve (where provided) and purchase (by virtue of a collection mandate agreement between URBANnext and the Provider) the following Mobility Services: rental of bicycles, cars, scooters and scooters, as well as the Electric Charging Service, to be used directly on URBI, according to the methods described in art. 5 that follows.
2.2 The aforementioned aggregation takes place for the sole purpose of facilitating the User in comparing and choosing between the different Mobility Services available in the surrounding geographical area. The URBI Services must therefore not be confused with the Mobility Services provided independently by the Providers, which are independent entities that provide, under their responsibility, Mobility Services to the User and with which the User concludes the contract relating to the use of the individual Mobility Services. URBANnext, therefore, remains completely estranged from the provision of Mobility Services and the related assistance by Providers to the User.
2.3 URBANnext provides support and assistance to the User exclusively in relation to operations and problems strictly related to the use and operation of the URBI App. The Provider is solely responsible for the quality of the Mobility Service provided, as well as for assistance and support to the User for problems related to the use of the Mobility Service.
2.4 By accepting these Rules and Conditions, the User confers on URBANnext a mandate having as its object the performance, in his name and on his behalf, of all acts and activities necessary towards the Providers for the purpose of booking (where provided and requested) and purchasing Mobility Services in Deep Integration.
3. Registration and URBI Account
3.1 To access the URBI App for the first time and use the URBI Services, the User is required to follow and correctly complete the registration and creation process of the URBI Account.
To register on the URBI App, the User must: a) have completed the eighteenth year of age; b) enter name and surname, tax code, telephone number, email address and, optionally, the address of their residence; c) choose a payment method among those admitted on URBI and enter the related credentials.
3.3 Also, in the event that the User intends to opt for Mobility Services consisting of car or scooter rental in Deep Integration - for which a driving license is necessary - URBI, for the purposes of the execution of the mandate referred to in art. 2.4 above, will ask the User to upload such document on the URBI App and will verify its validity before allowing the User to proceed with the operations referred to in art. 2.1 above.
3.4 The User acknowledges that the aforementioned data and any validated driving license will be saved and registered on URBI and with these the URBI Account will be created.
3.5 Before proceeding with registration on the URBI App, the User must expressly declare that they have read and accept these Rules and Conditions, also pursuant to art. 1341 and 1342 Civil Code, and the attached Privacy Policy.
3.6 Within the URBI Account, the User can, in the "History" section monitor bookings and purchases made; in the "Payments" section view their remaining balance; in the "Payment Methods" section recharge the Wallet using the payment method registered on the URBI Account; in the "Activate URBI credit voucher" section recharge the Wallet with a Voucher Code.
4. User Obligations
4.1 With the creation of a URBI Account and the use of URBI Services, the User declares and guarantees that they have the right, authority and ability to become part of these Rules and Conditions.
4.2 The User undertakes to use URBI only in accordance with these Rules and Conditions and to respect the rights of URBANnext, as well as to comply with all laws and regulations, both national and European, applicable regarding the use of URBI and/or URBI Services.
4.3 The User has the responsibility to provide truthful, up-to-date and complete data at the time of registration and use of URBI, to meet all the requirements for the use of Mobility Services, according to the conditions of use made available by individual Providers, as well as the requirements provided for by applicable law, for example with reference to age and driving license necessary for the use of vehicles.
4.4 URBI can be used only for legitimate purposes. The User therefore declares not to engage, even encouraging or conspiring with others, in any behavior not consistent with the purpose, intention and spirit of URBI.
4.5 The User acknowledges and accepts that: a) not to use URBI and URBI Services for improper, fraudulent and/or otherwise non-compliant purposes with applicable legal provisions; b) not to cause damage, disturbances or harassment to third parties during the use of URBI Services; c) provide accurate, complete and updated information; d) not to create more than one URBI Account; e) not to allow the use and/or not to assign their URBI Account to third parties.
4.6 Furthermore, the User agrees not to: a) upload, post, email or otherwise transmit.
5. Deep Integration Mobility Services
5.1 When the User finds a Deep Integration Mobility Service of interest on URBI, they can book it (where provided) and purchase it on URBI, after verifying the data entered and after viewing and accepting the specific terms and conditions of use of the individual Mobility Service and information on the processing of personal data carried out by the relative Provider accessible via the links indicated in the Detail Document present in the My Profile section of URBI, for the purpose of providing the purchased Mobility Service and assisting the User on the Mobility Service.
5.2 If the Provider offers a car or scooter rental service, URBI, for the purposes of executing the mandate referred to in the preceding art. 2.4, will ask the User to upload this document on the URBI App and will check its validity before allowing the User to proceed with the operations referred to in the preceding art. 2.1 to take advantage of the requested service.
5.3 Once the activities referred to in the preceding art. 5.2 have been carried out, the User will be able to start using the Mobility Service directly by unlocking the rental vehicle on the URBI App. At the same time, the Provider will receive all the User's data that will be necessary to stipulate the rental contract between the Provider and the User, also functional to provide any assistance activities to the User himself.
5.4 Once the final destination has been reached, the User will be able to end the ride on the Urbi App and, once finished, will have to make the payment directly on the URBI App to URBANnext by virtue of a mandate agreement for collection between the latter and the Provider. URBI will send the invoice for the cost of the ride to the User by email, on behalf of and on behalf of the Provider.
5.5 Electric Charging Service
The Electric Charging Service is provided at certain physical electric charging points (the "Charging Stations"). The use of the URBI App for the enjoyment of the Electric Charging Service provided by URBANnext is free of charge, except as provided for by the rules and conditions of the Electric Charging Service provided by Telepass ("Telepass Rules and Conditions"). The Electric Charging Service through URBI will be carried out according to the following methods: (a) the User will have to access the Electric Charging Service and will identify the nearest Charging Stations; the User will have the opportunity to get driving directions to the Charging Station in relation to his position; (b) where provided, the User can pre-book the Electric Charging Service to which a booking cost may be applied, viewable on URBI, in accordance with the Rules and Conditions of Telepass; (c) the User must go to the Charging Station; at this point, he will choose the type of connector he is interested in and therefore will have to enter the desired charging amount, confirming the same; (d) URBI confirms the use of the Electric Charging Service only after having verified the availability of the plafond in the Wallet; (e) once the charging cycle is over, the User will view the total cost of the Electric Charging Service, including additional costs and penalties where provided for by the Telepass Rules and Conditions; at this point, he will have to disconnect the connector of his electric car and proceed to abandon the place used for the Electric Charging Service; (f) if, for any reason, the payment is not authorized and/or is not successful, URBANnext will communicate to the User through the URBI App the failure to authorize and the provisions of art. 13.3 of this Contract will apply.
6. License and Intellectual Property
6.1 Notwithstanding the commitment to respect these Rules and Conditions, the User can download and install a copy of the version of the URBI App supported on their platform, carry out the registration and creation of the URBI Account, as well as use the URBI Services exclusively for personal and non-commercial use.
6.2 The User acknowledges and acknowledges that all information, data, software, music, sounds, photographs and images, videos and any other content present on the URBI App and/or related to the URBI Services are the exclusive property of URBANnext and its assignors. Users therefore do not acquire any right that refers to URBI and/or the URBI Services, other than that of using the latter in compliance with these Rules and Conditions.
6.3. The User declares to be aware that he cannot: a) copy, modify or distribute URBI and/or the URBI Services for any purpose; b) transfer, sublicense, rent, loan, lease or distribute URBI and/or the URBI Services to third parties; c) decode, decompile or create derivative works from URBI and/or the URBI Services; d) use URBI and/or the URBI Services in any way that is in competition with URBANnext; e) make available to third parties the features of URBI and/or the URBI Services present on their URBI Account.
6.4 URBANnext holds the intellectual and industrial property rights relating to URBI (including text, images, graphics, navigation structure and information) and, therefore, holds the exclusive right to exercise the exploitation rights of the same and, specifically, the rights of reproduction, distribution, publication and transformation.
6.5 Authorizing the User to access and use URBI does not imply the waiver, transfer, granting of license or total or partial assignment of any intellectual or industrial property right.
6.6 The User declares to be aware that it is forbidden to delete or tamper in any way the content of URBI and/or copy, reproduce or exploit in any way the contents included therein.
7. Costs and payments
7.1 The installation and use of URBI Services on the URBI App are free. The amounts that the User pays through URBI are the fees due for the purchase of Deep Integration Mobility Services, which URBANnext collects on behalf of and on behalf of the Provider on the URBI App, based on agreements with the latter, as well as any booking costs and/or penalties that may be provided by the Providers in relation to individual Mobility Services. These amounts are established exclusively by the individual Providers and indicated in their respective terms and conditions, also accessible via the links indicated in the Detail Document. URBI does not apply any additional cost and is completely unrelated to any price policy related to Mobility Services.
7.2 Once the use of the Mobility Service is over, the User will therefore be required to pay the fee indicated using their Wallet and, only in the case of insufficient credit on the Wallet, the User can supplement the payment using one of the payment methods allowed on URBI.
7.3 URBI will send an email to the User, in the name and on behalf of the Provider, the invoice for the Deep Integration Mobility Service used.
7.4 The User acknowledges that some Providers for certain specific Mobility Services may provide for a pre-authorization of a variable amount and determined by the Provider himself.
8. Wallet
8.1 URBI makes available to the User in its own URBI App a digital piggy bank, called Wallet, associated with the URBI Account to make payments of the fees for Mobility Services, as well as any booking costs or penalties that may be provided by the Providers in relation to individual Mobility Services.
8.2 The User can recharge the Wallet using the payment method registered on the URBI Account in the "Payment methods" section or by redeeming a Voucher Code in the "Activate URBI credit voucher" section.
8.3 In the "Payment" section, the User can view their remaining balance, i.e. the amount available to be used by the User for the purchase of Mobility Services and the Electric Charging Service exclusively through the URBI App. The remaining balance of the Wallet associated with a User's URBI Account cannot be transferred to another URBI Account.
8.4 The Wallet will take precedence over other payment methods. The credit available on the Wallet will be valid for a period of 12 (twelve) months from the date the recharge was made on the Wallet of the aforementioned amount. After the 12-month period, the Wallet amounts that have not been spent will be lost. . In all cases of termination of the Contract, except that more than 12 months have passed since the last Wallet recharge, any amounts present in the Wallet will be re-credited by URBANnext to the payment system used by the User on URBI as soon as possible.
8.5 If the purchase price of a certain Mobility Service is higher than the value of the credit present in the Wallet, the difference in value must be paid by the User using another payment method among those accepted on URBI.
9. Voucher Code
9.1 URBI can make alphanumeric codes available to Users corresponding to gift cards associated with the User's URBI Account, of a predetermined amount with which the User can recharge the Wallet.
9.2 The User can add credit to the Wallet via the "Activate URBI credit voucher" page by entering the Voucher Code in their possession.
9.3 The Voucher Codes are usable by the User exclusively on the URBI App in the 12 (twelve) months following the date of insertion in the APP, unless special conditions communicated to the User at the time of purchase or receipt of the Voucher Code.
10. Mobility Voucher
10.1 In the "Shop" section of the URBI Account, the User can view the promotional offers of the Providers and purchase, through the credit present in the Wallet or another payment method among those accepted on URBI or through the Discount Code a Mobility Voucher, that is the alphanumeric code associated with a predetermined amount.
10.2 The Mobility Voucher can be used exclusively on the website and/or on the platform of the Provider to which it refers, based on the terms and conditions set by the same Provider and made available in the "Info" Section of the Shop in the URBI Account (including, for example, the period of validity and/or geographical area of the same).
11. Promotional campaigns
11.1 In the "Shop" section of the URBI Account, the User can view any Discount Codes, i.e. the promotional discount code percentage that URBANnext can recognize to the User based (A) on agreements that URBANnextI stipulates with certain Partners or (B) at the discretion of URBANnext itself in line with its marketing activity towards its actual and potential Users.
11.2 The Discount Code must be manually entered by the User during the payment phase of the purchase of train, bus, ferry and local public transport tickets, for the purchase of a Mobility Voucher or a Voucher Code.
11.3 Discount Codes are not cumulative with each other and have the expiration date indicated by URBANnext from time to time.
11.4. In the "Shop" section of the URBI Account and/or on the communication channels activated by URBANnext itself, the User can view any Promotional Codes for the purchase of Mobility Services at advantageous conditions, the terms and methods of use of which will be communicated from time to time to the User.
12. Messages and notifications
12.1 As part of the URBI Services, the User may receive messages related to notices and/or other communications directly via URBI ("Push Messages") or via text messages (SMS), multimedia messages (MMS) or e-mail to the contacts indicated by the User to URBANnext on URBI.
12.2 The User is able to control and manage the Push Message settings at any time, activating or deactivating them through URBI and/or through the settings of their own Platform, except for the case of important service warnings and administrative messages.
13. Limitation of liability
13.1 URBANnext cannot be held responsible for any consequence resulting from the unavailability of the URBI App or the URBI Services due to any technical problem that is found to be beyond its control such as, for example and not exhaustively, mechanical failures, interruption of telephone and communication lines, interference "line-noise", the unavailability of connectivity and technical problems attributable to the User's device, for damage to the User's computer or mobile device, loss of data, damage to property or other damage that results from the use of URBI and/or the URBI Services contrary to these Rules and Conditions.
13.2 In no case will URBANnext, its officers, employees or agents, be liable for indirect, incidental, special, punitive or consequential damages of any kind arising from or in connection with the User's use of the URBI App and/or the URBI Services in violation of these Rules and Conditions.
13.3 Any use of the URBI App, the URBI Services and/or the Mobility Services that violates these Rules and Conditions and the applicable regulations is prohibited, with the consequent obligation of the User to indemnify and hold harmless URBANnext, its legal representatives and its employees from any harmful consequence: a) resulting from the violation of the prohibition provided for in this article; or that b) originates, even indirectly, from the use, in violation of these Rules and Conditions, of the URBI App and/or the URBI Services; c) relating to the incompleteness and/or failure to update the information provided by the User, who is solely responsible for its completeness and accuracy.
14. Right of reconsideration, right of withdrawal, suspension and termination
14.1 URBANnext and the User acknowledge that the Contract subscribed by the methods indicated above is configured as a "distance contract".
14.2 These Rules and Conditions have an indefinite duration, notwithstanding what is provided for by the following paragraphs of this art. 13.
14.3 Pursuant to the relevant rules of the Consumer Code, the User may withdraw from the Contract within 14 days from the date of conclusion of the Contract itself (coinciding with the date of registration of the User himself on URBI), without penalty and without costs. Before the expiry of the aforementioned term, the User may communicate in writing to URBANnext that he intends to exercise the right of reconsideration through registered mail a/r Viale Luigi Sturzo, 45, 20144 Milan ITALY or by email support@urbi.co. The User who exercises the right of reconsideration provided for by this article is required to pay only the fees related to the Mobility Services of which he has benefited up to the date of effective disablement of the URBI Account.
14.4 Notwithstanding the provisions of the previous article 14.3, the User may withdraw at any time from these Terms and Conditions, without penalty and without deactivation fees, through a specific communication to be sent directly to URBANnext through the email address or post office box indicated in the preceding art. 14.3.
14.5 In the event of withdrawal by the User, URBANnext undertakes to disable the URBI Account, without any charge to the User, within 15 days and to delete the data within 3 months, without prejudice to the data to be retained by law and/or for commitments to the Supplier. The User who exercises the right of withdrawal provided for in this article is required to pay only the fees relating to the Mobility Services he has used up until the date of actual deactivation of the URBI Account.
14.6 URBANnext has the right to withdraw from these Terms and Conditions by sending the relevant communication to the User with at least 2 months' written notice, by communication by email or ordinary mail, to the address indicated by the User and present in the database of URBANnext at the date of sending the withdrawal.
14.7 On the effective date of withdrawal from the Contract, URBANnext will disable the use of the URBI Account by the User. The User's obligation to pay URBANnext the amounts due as consideration for the Mobility Services he has enjoyed through URBI until the actual deactivation of the URBI Account remains unchanged.
14.8 If there is a just cause, URBANnext may withdraw from the Contract with immediate effect pursuant to and for the purposes of art. 33, paragraph 2, of the Consumer Code, giving written notice to the User, by email or ordinary mail, to the address indicated by the User and present in the database of URBANnext at the date of sending the withdrawal, containing the indication of the reasons for the withdrawal. For illustrative purposes only, such withdrawal may be exercised for: (a) changes in the applicable regulatory and regulatory discipline and/or evolution of the practices and orientations expressed by the competent Authorities; (b) evolution relating to the methods, costs and/or charges for the production, marketing and provision of the services provided or the market conditions and/or the competitive context, which can affect the economic, managerial, organizational, administrative or commercial aspects of the services themselves; (c) changes in technical, managerial, organizational, administrative and/or commercial needs (such as, by way of example: (i) developments or technical, managerial or commercial changes in the IT platforms and/or tools/applications for the provision, use or payment of the services provided by the Suppliers; (ii) developments or changes in the commercial and/or distribution policies of the services provided by URBANnext; (iii) restructuring and/or reorganization operations or implementation and/or review of specific internal procedures, also in function of the optimization and/or standardization of user-base management processes; (iv) developments or changes in fraud risk management policies and/or processes and/or protection, security and processing of user data).
14.9 URBANnext may suspend the use of the URBI App and URBI Services at any time and with immediate effect if there is a justified reason. For illustrative and non-limiting purposes, the suspension of the URBI Services may occur in the event of communication of incorrect and/or false and/or no longer valid data in the request for Mobility Services in Deep Integration, or failure to communicate, during the relationship, of the variation of the data provided at the time of initial registration; non-payment of the amounts due in the applicable terms, including the case of unsuccessful debits on the Wallet and/or through the payment method provided by the User to URBANnext. URBANnext will notify the User of the suspension of the URBI Services with 7 (seven) days' notice, when reasonably possible. Following any clarifications that the User may provide to URBANnext and/or further checks carried out by URBANnext, the latter may restore the URBI Services. If, instead, URBANnext considers the justified reasons mentioned above to be existing, it may withdraw from the relevant Contract in accordance with and with the effects of the provisions contained in the previous art. 14.8 or, if the conditions exist, terminate the Contract itself pursuant to art. 1456 c.c. and cease the URBI Services, in accordance with and with the effects of the provisions contained in the following article 14.10.
14.10 The Parties agree that, notwithstanding any right of URBANnext to compensation for damages and to whatever else provided by law and this Contract, the contractual relationship relating to the URBI Services can be legally resolved, pursuant to and for the purposes of art. 1456 c.c., by URBANnext: (a). In every case of ascertained violation of the punctual payment of all amounts due by the User; (b). In every case of fraudulent use of the URBI App; (c). if the User does not fulfill his obligations provided for in this Contract in articles 4.4, 4.5, 4.6, 6.2 and 6.3.
14.11 The right of URBANnext to obtain compensation from the User for any damages suffered due to the violation of these Terms and Conditions and/or applicable regulations is in any case reserved.
15. Modification of these Terms and Conditions
15.1 These Terms and Conditions and subsequent modifications and integrations constitute the entire agreement between the User and URBANnext concerning URBI and the URBI Services and supersede all previous or contemporary communications.
15.2 URBANnext reserves the right to unilaterally modify these Terms and Conditions, even unfavorably to the User, with reference, in particular, to the provision of any fees and costs of the Services provided, in the presence of the following justified reasons, which will be the subject of detailed communication on the occasion of any modification: (a) changes in the applicable regulatory and regulatory discipline and/or evolution of the practices and orientations expressed by the competent Authorities; (b) evolution relating to the methods, costs and/or charges for the production, marketing and provision of the services provided or the market conditions and/or the competitive context, which can affect the economic, managerial, organizational, administrative or commercial aspects of the services themselves; (c) changes in technical, managerial, organizational, administrative and/or commercial needs (such as, by way of example: (i) developments or technical, managerial or commercial changes in the IT platforms and/or tools/applications for the provision, use or payment of the services provided by the Suppliers; (ii) developments or changes in the commercial and/or distribution policies of the services provided by URBANnext; (iii) restructuring and/or reorganization operations or implementation and/or review of specific internal procedures, also in function of the optimization and/or standardization of user-base management processes; (iv) developments or changes in fraud risk management policies and/or processes and/or protection, security and processing of user data).
15.3 Any changes will be communicated in writing to the User as a "Proposal for unilateral modification of the Contract", indicating: (a) the specific reasons justifying the proposed modification; (b) the effective date of the modification, which may not be less than 2 (two) months from the date of receipt of the communication; (c) the User's right to exercise the right of withdrawal, if he does not intend to adhere to the said proposal and, (d) any further information required by the current legislation.
15.4 The proposal for unilateral modification of these Terms and Conditions is sent to the User by email, to the address validly communicated by him to URBANnext, or, in the absence, by ordinary mail, to the address indicated by the user and present in the URBANnext database at the date of sending the proposal. The User, within the indicated term of effectiveness of the proposed modification, may withdraw, without charges or penalties, from the Terms and Conditions by communication sent to URBANnext by email, to the address indicated in the proposal for unilateral modification, or by ordinary mail, to the address indicated in these Terms and Conditions. After the said term has elapsed without the User having communicated his withdrawal, the proposed changes will be considered accepted.
15.5 The above will not apply in the case of changes imposed by mandatory legal or regulatory provisions or by measures of competent authorities, which will be applied, even without notice, in accordance with the provisions of the relevant rules or measures.
16. Third party and Supplier Services
16.1 The URBI App may include links to services, websites or resources provided and managed independently by third parties.
16.2 URBANnext is not responsible nor does it offer any guarantee about the information provided by third parties, as well as the content, availability, accuracy and operation of sites, resources and/or third party services, including Mobility Services.
16.3 The User acknowledges that, given the extraneousness of URBANnext, the point of contact for any questions or complaints relating to Mobility Services is the Supplier who provides the individual Mobility Service on URBI.
16.5 URBANnext informs the User that the trademarks and logos that distinguish the Mobility Services are the exclusive property of the respective Suppliers and the reproduction of such distinctive signs within URBI occurs for purely descriptive purposes pursuant to art. 21, paragraph 1, letter c of the Industrial Property Code (Legislative Decree 10 February 2005, no. 30). The User is expressly prohibited from reproducing or using the trademarks and logos of the Suppliers in any way without their express authorization.
17. Processing of personal data
17.1 URBANnext will process the User's personal data as described in the Information on the processing of personal data prepared pursuant to article 13 GDPR and provided to the User at the time of creation of the URBI Account, as well as always available in the URBI App in the most updated version.
17.2 URBANnext, furthermore, makes available to the User the information on the processing of personal data prepared by the Partners as independent Data Controllers of the User's data within the Mobility Services.
18. Applicable law and competent forum
18.1 These Terms and Conditions and any dispute or claim (including pre-contractual disputes) arising from or in connection with it or its subject or formation are governed by and interpreted in accordance with the law of the Italian Republic.
18.2 URBANnext and the User acknowledge and agree that for the resolution of any dispute or claim (including pre-contractual disputes) arising from or in connection with these Terms and Conditions or its object or formation, the forum of residence or domicile of the User is competent.
19. Complaints and questions
19.1 In case of questions relating to the Terms and Conditions and/or URBI Services, the User can contact URBANnext at the e-mail address info@urbi.co.
19.2 Finally, the User can submit a complaint related to the URBI Services in writing, sending a communication to the attention of URBANnext, at the e-mail address info@urbi.co or via PEC at the address urbi.it@legalmail.it.
19.3 The User undertakes to cooperate with URBANnext and to provide the necessary information to investigate the complaint referred to in the previous article 21.2 and to resolve it as quickly as possible.
20. Final provisions
20.1 If any provision of these Terms and Conditions is deemed invalid by a court of competent jurisdiction, the remaining provisions will remain in effect for all purposes.
20.2 No waiver of any term of these Terms and Conditions will be considered a further or permanent waiver of such term or any other term and URBANnext's failure to enforce any right or clause under the Terms and Conditions will not constitute a waiver of that right or provision.
20.3 URBANnext may assign, transfer or delegate the entire Contract or its above-mentioned rights and obligations without the User's consent.
20.4 No agency, partnership, joint venture, or employment relationship has been created as a result of these Terms and Conditions.
20.5. The User declares to have read and understood and to specifically accept, also pursuant to articles 1341 and 1342 of the Civil Code, as well as art. 33 of the Consumer Code where applicable, the provisions of the articles:
Art. 8.4 (Wallet).
Art. 13 (Limitation of liability);
Art. 14 (Right of second thoughts, right of withdrawal, resolution);
Art. 15 (Amendment of these Terms and Conditions);
Art. 18 (Applicable law and competent forum);
Art. 20.3 (Assignment of the Contract).
TÉRMINOS Y CONDICIONES
Última actualización: 5 de octubre de 2021
Bienvenido al mundo de la aplicación URBI (en lo sucesivo denominada "App URB" o simplemente "URBI"), propiedad de la empresa suiza URBANnext SA, n.º CHE-149.120.999, con domicilio social en Vicolo de' Calvi, 2-6830 Chiasso, Suiza ("URBANnext").
Al acceder a URBI mediante un dispositivo móvil o un ordenador a través del sitio web www.URBI.co (en adelante, la "Plataforma"), al continuar con el registro necesario para crear tu Cuenta URBI, confirmas que has leído y aceptado estos términos y condiciones ("Términos y Condiciones" o también "Contrato") y la información relativa al tratamiento de datos personales de acuerdo con el Reglamento de la UE 619/2016 ("RGPD") adjunto ("Política de Privacidad").
Definiciones
Servicios URBI: designa (i) el servicio de agregación y puesta a disposición en la App URBI de los Servicios de Movilidad y del Servicio de Recarga Eléctrica, tal y como se define a continuación, prestados por URBANnext a través de URBI, (ii) los servicios auxiliares relacionados con las distintas funcionalidades de URBI, cuando estén disponibles en virtud de acuerdos con Proveedores individuales, como la reserva y el pago del Servicio de Movilidad, (iii) el servicio de distribución de Vales de Movilidad, tal y como se define a continuación, para su uso en las plataformas de los Proveedores, y (iv) el servicio de distribución de Códigos de Vales, tal y como se define a continuación, para su uso en la App URBI, quedando expresamente excluidos de la definición de "Servicios URBI" los Servicios de Movilidad prestados de forma autónoma por los Proveedores individuales, tal y como se define a continuación.
Servicios de Movilidad: designa los servicios relacionados con el transporte de personas prestados por los Proveedores de forma independiente y autónoma con respecto a URBANnext, puestos a disposición en cada momento en URBI y regulados individualmente por los términos y condiciones de uso puestas a disposición por los distintos Proveedores.
Servicio de recarga eléctrica: designa el servicio de recarga de vehículos eléctricos prestado por Telepass S.p.A. como Proveedor de Movilidad Eléctrica (Eletric Mobility Provider) al Usuario a través de la App URBI, previa aceptación por parte del Usuario de los Términos y Condiciones del Servicio de Recarga prestado por Telepass S.p.A., en función de los acuerdos suscritos con los distintos Operadores de Puntos de Recarga (Charging Point Operator).
Usuario: designa la persona física mayor de edad que, tras registrarse, accede a la App URBI y/o utiliza los Servicios URBI.
Proveedor: designa la empresa, distinta de URBANnext, que proporciona los Servicios de Movilidad agregados en la App URBI en virtud de contratos específicos con URBANnext. En particular, el Proveedor del Servicio de Recarga de Electricidad es Telepass S.p.A. El Proveedor es el único responsable de la calidad del Servicio de Movilidad prestado, así como de la asistencia correspondiente al Usuario. En URBI, el Proveedor también podrá promocionar los Servicios de Movilidad a través de campañas promocionales en las que, con el consentimiento del Usuario y de acuerdo con la normativa vigente, se concedan al Usuario descuentos, regalos, etc.
Socio: designa la tercera personal, distinto del Proveedor, que ofrece a sus empleados, clientes y/o proveedores Códigos de Descuento para ser utilizados en URBI.
Código del Consumidor: designa el Decreto Legislativo n.º 206 de 6 de septiembre de 2005. N.º 206 de 6 de septiembre de 2005.
Cuenta URBI: designa la cuenta creada por el Usuario tras introducir y registrar sus datos y el método de pago elegido (tarjeta de crédito o tarjeta de prepago del Usuario) en la App URBI para utilizar los Servicios URBI.
Monedero: designa la hucha virtual asociada a la Cuenta URBI del Usuario, que, una vez recargada con un Código de Vales en posesión del Usuario, indica el importe disponible que puede utilizar el Usuario para adquirir los Servicios de Movilidad y el Servicio de Recarga Eléctrica exclusivamente a través de la App URBI. El Monedero tiene prioridad sobre otros métodos de pago, como la tarjeta de crédito o la tarjeta de prepago del Usuario, tal y como se especifica en el artículo 8.
Integración profunda o Deep Integration: designa la integración tecnológica a través de la API (Application Programming Interface) de un Proveedor de Servicios de Movilidad, según el artículo 2.1 letra (a) siguiente, que permite al Usuario buscar, localizar, reservar, comprar y utilizar el Servicio de Movilidad directamente en la App URBI sin ser redirigido a la plataforma del Proveedor, y por tanto sin necesidad de registro previo en la plataforma del Proveedor.
Integración Ligera o Light Integration: designa la integración tecnológica a través de la API (Application Programming Interface) de un Proveedor de Servicios de Movilidad, según el artículo 2.1 letra (b) siguiente, que permite al Usuario buscar e identificar un Servicio de Movilidad en la App URBI, seleccionarlo y ser redirigido a la plataforma del Proveedor para la eventual reserva, compra y uso del Servicio de Movilidad.
Código de Vale: designa el código alfanumérico correspondiente a una tarjeta regalo asociada a la Cuenta URBI del Usuario, de un importe predeterminado con el que el Usuario puede recargar el Monedero.
Vale de Movilidad: designa el código alfanumérico asociado a un importe predeterminado, que puede ser adquirido en URBI a través del Monedero u otro medio de pago de los aceptados en URBI. El Vale de Movilidad permite al Usuario utilizar los servicios relacionados con el transporte de personas proporcionados por el Proveedor individual exclusivamente en la plataforma del Proveedor.
Código de Descuento: designa el código de descuento promocional porcentual obtenido por el Usuario en función de (A) acuerdos celebrados por URBANnext con determinados Socios, o (B) a criterio de la propia URBANnext, en línea con sus actividades de marketing hacia sus Usuarios reales y potenciales. El Código de Descuento debe ser introducido manualmente por el Usuario al pagar por la compra de billetes de tren, autobús, ferry y transporte público local, por la compra de un Vale de Movilidad o por un Código de Vale. Los Códigos de descuento no se pueden combinar entre sí.
2. ¿Qué es URBI?
2.1 URBI es un agregador de Servicios de Movilidad compartidos que, para llegar al destino deseado, permite al Usuario realizar las siguientes operaciones comparando una serie de Servicios de Movilidad: (a) en el caso de Light Integration: buscar y localizar los siguientes Servicios de Movilidad: billetes de tren, autobús, ferry y transporte público local, uso de taxis, y ser redirigido a la plataforma del Proveedor para utilizar el Servicio de Movilidad elegido a través de la plataforma del Proveedor; (b) en el caso de Deep Integration buscar, identificar, reservar (en su caso) y comprar (en virtud de un acuerdo de mandato de recogida entre URBANnext y el Proveedor) los siguientes Servicios de Movilidad: alquiler de bicicletas, coches, scooters y patinetes, así como el Servicio de Recarga Eléctrica, para ser utilizado directamente en URBI, según los procedimientos descritos en el art. 5 abajo.
2.2 La citada agregación se realiza con el único fin de facilitar al Usuario la comparación y elección entre los distintos Servicios de Movilidad disponibles en el entorno geográfico. Los Servicios URBI no deben, por tanto, confundirse con los Servicios de Movilidad prestados de forma autónoma por los Proveedores, que son entidades independientes que prestan los Servicios de Movilidad al Usuario, bajo su propia responsabilidad, y con los que el Usuario estipula el contrato relativo al uso del Servicio de Movilidad individual. Por lo tanto, URBANnext se mantiene totalmente ajena a la prestación de los Servicios de Movilidad y a la relativa asistencia de los proveedores al Usuario.
2.3 URBANnext proporciona soporte y asistencia al Usuario exclusivamente en relación con las operaciones y problemas estrictamente relacionados con el uso y funcionamiento de la App URBI. El Proveedor es el único responsable de la calidad del Servicio de Movilidad prestado, así como de la asistencia y el apoyo prestados al Usuario por problemas relacionados con el uso del Servicio de Movilidad.
2.4 Al aceptar estos Términos y Condiciones, el Usuario otorga a URBANnext una autorización para realizar, en su nombre y por su cuenta, todos los actos y actividades necesarios en relación con los proveedores a efectos de la reserva (cuando sea aplicable y necesaria) y la compra de los Servicios de Movilidad en Integración Profunda.
3. Registro y cuenta URBI
3.1 Para acceder a la App URBI y utilizar los Servicios URBI por primera vez, el Usuario debe seguir y completar correctamente el procedimiento de registro y creación de la Cuenta URBI.
Para registrarse en la App URBI, el Usuario debe: a) ser mayor de 18 años; b) introducir su nombre y apellidos, número de identificación fiscal, número de teléfono, dirección de correo electrónico y, opcionalmente, su domicilio; c) elegir un método de pago entre los permitidos en URBI e introducir las credenciales correspondientes.
3.3 Además, en el caso de que el Usuario pretenda optar por los Servicios de Movilidad consistentes en el alquiler de coches o scooters en Deep Integration, se requerirá también un permiso de conducir, cuya validez será verificada en URBI mediante un sistema tecnológico de verificación de identidad.
3.4 El Usuario reconoce que los datos antes mencionados se guardarán y registrarán en URBI, y se creará una Cuenta URBI con ellos.
3.5 Al continuar con el registro en la App URBI, el Usuario declara haber leído y aceptado estos Términos y Condiciones, también de acuerdo con los artículos 1341 y 1342 del Código Civil italiano, y la Política de Privacidad adjunta.
3.6 Dentro de la Cuenta URBI, el Usuario puede, en la sección "Historial", hacer un seguimiento de las reservas y compras realizadas; en la sección "Pagos", ver el saldo restante; en la sección "Formas de pago", recargar el Monedero utilizando el método de pago registrado en la Cuenta URBI; en la sección "Activar vale de crédito URBI", recargar el Monedero con un Código de Vale.
4. Obligaciones del usuario
4.1 Para utilizar URBI, el Usuario debe aceptar los presentes Términos y Condiciones, también de acuerdo con los artículos 1341 y 1342 del Código Civil italiano, y la Política de Privacidad, cuya aceptación implica la celebración de un contrato entre URBANnext y el Usuario para la utilización de los Servicios URBI. Al crear una Cuenta URBI y utilizar los Servicios URBI, el Usuario declara y garantiza que tiene el derecho, la autoridad y la capacidad para ser parte de estos Términos y Condiciones.
4.2 El Usuario se compromete a utilizar URBI únicamente de acuerdo con los presentes Términos y Condiciones y respetando los derechos de URBANnext, así como a cumplir todas las leyes y reglamentos, tanto nacionales como europeos, aplicables al uso de URBI y/o de los Servicios URBI.
4.3 El Usuario es responsable de proporcionar datos verdaderos, actualizados y completos en el momento del registro y uso de URBI, y de cumplir todos los requisitos para el uso de los Servicios de Movilidad, de acuerdo con las condiciones de uso puestas a disposición por los distintos Proveedores, así como los requisitos de la legislación aplicable, por ejemplo, en lo que se refiere a la edad y al permiso de conducir necesarios para el uso de los vehículos.
4.4 URBI solo puede utilizarse con fines legítimos. Por lo tanto, el Usuario declara que no se involucrará, ni siquiera alentando o conspirando con otros, en ningún comportamiento incompatible con el propósito, la intención y el espíritu de URBI.
4.5 El Usuario reconoces y se compromete a: a) no utilizar URBI y los Servicios URBI con fines indebidos, fraudulentos y/o no conformes con las disposiciones de ley aplicables; b) no causar daños, molestias o acoso a terceros al utilizar los Servicios URBI; c) proporcionar información precisa, completa y actualizada; d) no crear más de una Cuenta URBI; e) no permitir el uso y/o no ceder tu Cuenta URBI a terceros.
4.6 Además, el Usuario acepta no: (a) cargar, publicar, enviar por correo electrónico o transmitir de otro modo virus u otro software malicioso que pueda interrumpir, destruir o limitar el funcionamiento de URBI o interferir con el acceso de los Usuarios a URBI; (b) eludir, desactivar o interferir de otro modo con las características de seguridad de URBI; (c) utilizar metaetiquetas u otro texto oculto o metadatos con el nombre, la marca comercial, la URL o el nombre del producto de URBANnext; (d) descifrar, descompilar, desmontar, aplicar ingeniería inversa o intentar descubrir o determinar de otro modo el código fuente de URBI.
5. Servicios de movilidad en Deep Integration
5.1 Cuando el Usuario encuentre en URBI un Servicio de Movilidad de Integración Profunda o Deep Integration que le interese, podrá reservarlo (en su caso) y comprarlo en URBI, tras verificar los datos introducidos y después de ver y aceptar los términos y condiciones de uso específicos del Servicio de Movilidad individual y la información sobre el tratamiento de datos personales realizado por el Proveedor correspondiente, a los que se puede acceder a través de los enlaces indicados en el Documento Detallado en la sección Mi Perfil de URBI, con el fin de prestar el Servicio de Movilidad comprado y asistir al Usuario en el Servicio de Movilidad.
5.2 Si el Proveedor ofrece un servicio de alquiler de coches o scooters, será obligatorio verificar la validez del permiso de conducir.
5.3 Una vez realizadas las actividades descritas en el artículo 5.2 anterior, el Usuario podrá comenzar a utilizar el Servicio de Movilidad directamente desbloqueando el vehículo de alquiler en la App URBI. Al mismo tiempo, el Proveedor recibirá todos los datos del Usuario que sean necesarios para celebrar el contrato de alquiler entre el Proveedor y el Usuario, incluidos los necesarios para prestar cualquier asistencia al Usuario.
5.4 Una vez alcanzado el destino final, el Usuario podrá finalizar el viaje en la App URBI y, una vez finalizado, deberá realizar el pago directamente en la App URBI a URBANnext en virtud de un acuerdo de autorización de cobro entre este último y el Proveedor. URBI enviará por correo electrónico al Usuario, en nombre del Proveedor, la factura del coste del viaje.
5.5(A) Servicio de Recarga de Electricidad
Telepass S.p.A, en su calidad de Proveedor de Movilidad Eléctrica o Eletric Mobility Provider (“EMP”), proporciona el Servicio de Recarga Eléctrica al Usuario a través de la App URBI, previa aceptación por parte del Usuario de las normas y condiciones del Servicio de Recarga Eléctrica prestado por Telepass S.p.A. en función de los acuerdos suscritos con los Operadores de Puntos de Recarga o Charging Point Operator (“CPO”). El Servicio de Recarga Eléctrica se suministra en determinados puntos físicos de recarga eléctrica (las "Estaciones de Recarga"). El uso de URBI para la utilización del Servicio de Recarga de Electricidad URBANnext es gratuito, salvo lo dispuesto en las normas y condiciones del Servicio de Recarga de Electricidad Telepass ("Términos y Condiciones Telepass"). El Servicio de Recarga de Electricidad a través de URBI se realizará de la siguiente manera: (a) el Usuario accederá al Servicio de Recarga Eléctrica y localizará las Estaciones de Recarga más cercanas; el Usuario recibirá indicaciones para llegar a la Estación de Recarga con respecto a su ubicación; (b) cuando esté previsto, el Usuario podrá realizar una reserva del Servicio de Recarga Eléctrica, a la que se podrá aplicar una tarifa de reserva, que podrá ser visualizada en URBI, de acuerdo con los Términos y Condiciones de Telepass; (c) el Usuario deberá dirigirse a la Estación de Recarga; en este punto, elegirá el tipo de conector de su interés y, por tanto, deberá teclear el importe de la recarga deseada, confirmando la misma; (d) URBI confirmará el uso del Servicio de Recarga Eléctrica solo después de haber verificado la disponibilidad del límite en el Monedero; (e) una vez finalizado el ciclo de recarga, el Usuario verá el coste total del Servicio de Recarga Eléctrica, incluidos los costes adicionales y las penalizaciones cuando así lo prevean los Términos y Condiciones de Telepass; en este punto, se debe desconectar el conector del coche eléctrico y abandonar el lugar del Servicio de Recarga Eléctrica; (f) si, por cualquier motivo, el pago no es autorizado y/o no se completa con éxito, URBANnext informará al Usuario, a través de la App URBI, del pago no autorizado, siendo de aplicación el artículo 14.3 del presente Contrato.
6. Licencia y propiedad intelectual
6.1 Sin perjuicio del compromiso del Usuario de cumplir con estos Términos y Condiciones, el Usuario puede descargar e instalar una copia de la versión compatible de la App URBI en su Plataforma, registrar y crear la Cuenta URBI, y utilizar los Servicios URBI exclusivamente para uso personal y no comercial.
6.2 El Usuario acepta y reconoce que toda la información, datos, software, música, sonidos, fotografías e imágenes, vídeos y cualquier otro contenido presente en URBI y/o relacionado con los Servicios URBI son propiedad exclusiva de URBANnext y sus cedentes. Por lo tanto, los Usuarios no adquieren ningún derecho en relación con URBI y/o los Servicios URBI, salvo el derecho a utilizar estos últimos de acuerdo con estos Términos y Condiciones.
Los usuarios declaran ser conscientes de que no pueden: a) copiar, modificar o distribuir URBI y/o los Servicios URBI para cualquier fin; b) transferir, sublicenciar, alquilar, prestar, arrendar o distribuir URBI y/o los Servicios URBI a terceros; c) decodificar, descompilar o crear obras derivadas de URBI y/o los Servicios URBI; d) utilizar URBI y/o los Servicios URBI de cualquier forma que compita con URBANnext; e) poner a disposición de terceros las funcionalidades de URBI y/o los Servicios URBI presentes en su Cuenta URBI.
6.4 URBANnext es titular de los derechos de propiedad intelectual e industrial relativos a URBI (incluyendo textos, imágenes, gráficos, estructura de navegación e información), por lo que le corresponde el ejercicio exclusivo de los derechos de explotación de los mismos, y en concreto, los derechos de reproducción, distribución, publicación y transformación.
6.5 La autorización al Usuario para el acceso y uso de URBI no implica la renuncia, transmisión, licencia o cesión total o parcial de ningún derecho de propiedad intelectual o industrial.
6.6 El Usuario declara conocer que está prohibido suprimir o manipular de cualquier forma los contenidos de URBI, y/o copiar, reproducir o explotar de cualquier forma los contenidos incluidos en los mismos.
7. Costes y pagos
7.1 La instalación y el uso de los Servicios URBI en la App URBI son gratuitos. Los únicos importes que el Usuario paga a través de URBI son las tarifas por la compra de Servicios de Movilidad en Deep Integration que URBANnext, en la App URBI, cobra en nombre y por cuenta del Proveedor en función de los acuerdos con este último, así como las tarifas de reserva y/o penalizaciones que puedan proporcionar los Proveedores en relación con los Servicios de Movilidad individuales. Estos importes son establecidos exclusivamente por cada uno de los Proveedores y se indican en los respectivos términos y condiciones, a los que también se puede acceder a través de los enlaces indicados en el Documento Detallado. URBI no aplica ningún coste adicional y es completamente ajeno a cualquier política de precios relacionada con los Servicios de Movilidad.
7.2 Una vez finalizada la utilización del Servicio de Movilidad, el Usuario deberá, por tanto, abonar la cantidad indicada mediante su Monedero y, solo en el caso de que no haya crédito suficiente en el misma, el Usuario podrá complementar el pago mediante uno de los medios de pago permitidos en URBI.
7.3 URBI enviará por correo electrónico al Usuario, en nombre y por cuenta del Proveedor, la factura correspondiente al Servicio de Movilidad de Deep Integration utilizado.
7.4 El Usuario reconoce que algunos Proveedores para determinados Servicios de Movilidad específicos pueden prever una autorización previa de un importe variable establecido por el propio Proveedor.
8. Monedero
8.1 URBI pone a disposición del Usuario una hucha digital, denominada Monedero, asociada a la Cuenta URBI para realizar los pagos de las tarifas de los Servicios de Movilidad, así como las tarifas de reserva o penalizaciones que puedan establecer los Proveedores en relación con los Servicios de Movilidad individuales.
8.2 El Usuario puede recargar el Monedero utilizando el método de pago registrado en la Cuenta URBI en la sección "Métodos de pago" o canjeando un Código de Vale en la sección "Activar Vale de crédito URBI".
8.3 En la sección "Pago", el Usuario puede ver su saldo residual, es decir, la cantidad disponible que puede utilizar el Usuario para comprar Servicios de Movilidad y Servicio de Recarga de Electricidad exclusivamente a través de la App URBI. El saldo restante del Monedero asociado a la Cuenta URBI de un Usuario no puede ser transferido a otra Cuenta URBI.
8.4 El Monedero tiene prioridad sobre otros métodos de pago. El crédito disponible en el Monedero no tiene fecha de caducidad y, por tanto, puede ser utilizado por el Usuario en cualquier momento. En todos los casos de rescisión del Contrato, los importes que se encuentren en el Monedero serán abonados por URBANnext en el sistema de pago utilizado por el Usuario en URBI a la mayor brevedad posible.
8.5 Si el precio de compra de un determinado Servicio de Movilidad es superior al valor del crédito presente en el Monedero, la diferencia de valor deberá ser abonada por el Usuario utilizando otro método de pago de los aceptados en URBI.
9. Código del Vale
9.1 URBI podrá poner a disposición de los Usuarios códigos alfanuméricos correspondientes a tarjetas regalo que podrán ser asociadas a la Cuenta URBI del Usuario, de un importe predeterminado, con las que el Usuario podrá recargar el Monedero.
9.2 El Usuario puede añadir crédito al Monedero a través de la página "Activar Vale de crédito URBI", introduciendo el Código de Vale que posee.
9.3 Los Códigos de Vale pueden ser utilizados por el Usuario exclusivamente en URBI y son válidos durante 12 (doce) meses a partir de la última compra de Servicios de Movilidad, salvo que se comuniquen condiciones especiales al Usuario en el momento de la compra o recepción del Código de Vale.
10. Vale de Movilidad
10.1 En la sección "Tienda" de la Cuenta URBI, el Usuario puede ver las ofertas promocionales de los Proveedores y comprar, utilizando el crédito del Monedero u otro método de pago entre los aceptados en URBI o el Código de Descuento, un Vale de Movilidad, es decir, un código alfanumérico asociado a un importe predeterminado.
10.2 El Vale de Movilidad solo podrá ser utilizado en el sitio web y/o plataforma del Proveedor al que hace referencia, de acuerdo con los términos y condiciones establecidos por el Proveedor y puestos a disposición en la sección "Información" de la Tienda en la Cuenta URBI (incluyendo, a modo de ejemplo, el período de validez y/o área geográfica del mismo).
11. Campañas promocionales
11.1 En la sección "Tienda" de la Cuenta URBI, el Usuario también puede ver los Códigos de Descuento, es decir, el código de descuento de porcentaje promocional obtenido por el Usuario sobre la base de (A) acuerdos celebrados por URBI con determinados Socios, o (B) a discreción de URBANnext, en línea con sus actividades de marketing hacia sus Usuarios reales y potenciales.
11.2 El Código de Descuento debe ser introducido manualmente por el Usuario al pagar por la compra de billetes de tren, autobús, ferry y transporte público local, por la compra de un Vale de Movilidad o por un Código de Vale.
11.3 Los Códigos de Descuento no son acumulables entre sí y tienen la fecha de caducidad que URBANnext indique en cada momento.
12. Mensajes y notificaciones
12.1 En el ámbito de los Servicios URBI, el Usuario podrá recibir mensajes relativos a avisos y/u otras comunicaciones directamente a través de URBI ("Notificaciones Push") o a través de mensajes de texto (SMS), mensajes multimedia (MMS) o correos electrónicos a los contactos indicados por el Usuario a URBANnext en URBI.
12.2 El Usuario puede controlar y gestionar la configuración de las Notificaciones Push en cualquier momento, activándolos o desactivándolos a través de URBI y/o a través de la configuración de su Plataforma, salvo en el caso de avisos de servicio importantes y mensajes de carácter administrativo.
13. Cláusula de limitación de responsabilidad
13.1 URBANnext no se responsabiliza de las consecuencias derivadas de la no disponibilidad de URBI o de los Servicios URBI como consecuencia de cualquier problema técnico ajeno a su voluntad, como, por ejemplo, fallos mecánicos, interrupción de las líneas telefónicas y de comunicación interferencias de "ruido en la línea", no disponibilidad de la conectividad y problemas técnicos relacionados con el dispositivo del Usuario, por daños en el ordenador o dispositivo móvil del Usuario, pérdida de datos, daños a la propiedad u otros daños que resulten del uso de URBI y/o de los Servicios URBI contrario a estos Términos y Condiciones.
13.2 En ningún caso URBANnext, sus funcionarios, empleados o agentes, serán responsables de ningún daño indirecto, incidental, especial, punitivo o consecuente de cualquier tipo que surja de o en relación con el uso de URBI y/o de los Servicios URBI por parte del Usuario en contra de estos Términos y Condiciones.
13.3 Queda prohibido cualquier uso de URBI, de los Servicios URBI y/o de los Servicios de Movilidad que infrinja estos Términos y Condiciones y la normativa aplicable, con la consiguiente obligación por parte del Usuario de indemnizar y mantener indemne a URBANnext, sus representantes legales y empleados de cualquier consecuencia perjudicial a) que se deriven de la violación de la prohibición prevista en este artículo; o que b) se originen, incluso indirectamente, por la utilización, en violación de estos Términos y Condiciones, de URBI y/o de los Servicios URBI; c) que se refieran a la falta de exhaustividad y/o de actualización de la información proporcionada por el Usuario, que es el único responsable de su integridad y exactitud.
14. Derecho de reconsideración, derecho de desistimiento, suspensión y rescisión
14.1 URBANnext y el Usuario reconocen que el Contrato firmado mediante los procedimientos mencionados es un "contrato a distancia".
14.2 Los presentes Términos y Condiciones tienen una duración indefinida, sin perjuicio de lo dispuesto en los apartados siguientes de este artículo 14.
14.3 De conformidad con las disposiciones pertinentes del Código de los Consumidores, el Usuario puede desistir del Contrato en un plazo de 14 días a partir de la fecha de celebración del propio Contrato (coincidiendo con la fecha de registro del Usuario en URBI), sin penalización y sin coste alguno. Antes de la expiración de dicho plazo, el Usuario podrá informar por escrito a URBANnext de su intención de ejercer su derecho de desistimiento mediante carta certificada con acuse de recibo a la dirección Corso Italia, 3 - 20122 Milán (MI) o por correo electrónico support@urbi.co. El Usuario que ejerza su derecho de reconsideración, según lo previsto en este artículo, solo deberá pagar las tarifas relativas a los Servicios de Movilidad que haya utilizado hasta la fecha de desactivación efectiva de la Cuenta URBI.
14.4 Sin perjuicio de lo dispuesto en el artículo 14.3 anterior, el Usuario podrá desistir de las presentes Condiciones Generales en cualquier momento, sin penalización y sin gastos de inhabilitación, mediante comunicación específica que deberá ser enviada directamente a URBANnext a través de la dirección de correo electrónico o apartado postal indicado en el artículo 14.2 anterior.
14.5 En caso de desistimiento del Usuario, URBANnext se compromete a desactivar la cuenta URBI, sin coste alguno para el Usuario, en un plazo de 15 días, así como a eliminar los datos en un plazo de 3 meses, sin perjuicio de los datos que deban conservarse por ley y/o compromisos con el Proveedor. El Usuario que ejerza el derecho de desistimiento previsto en este artículo solo deberá pagar las tarifas relativas a los Servicios de Movilidad que haya utilizado hasta la fecha de desactivación efectiva de la Cuenta URBI.
14.6 URBANnext tiene derecho a desistir de los presentes Términos y Condiciones mediante el envío de la correspondiente comunicación al Usuario con una antelación mínima de dos meses, por correo electrónico o por correo ordinario, a la dirección indicada por el Usuario y presente en la base de datos de URBANnext en la fecha de envío del desistimiento.
14.7 En la fecha efectiva de desistimiento del Contrato, URBANnext desactivará el uso de la Cuenta URBI por parte del Usuario Ello se entiende sin perjuicio de la obligación del Usuario de abonar a URBANnext los importes debidos en concepto de contraprestación por los Servicios de Movilidad utilizados a través de URBI en la fecha de inhabilitación efectiva de la Cuenta URBI.
14.8 Si existe una causa justificada, URBANnext podrá desistir del Contrato con efecto inmediato, de acuerdo con el artículo 33, párrafo 2, del Código del Consumidor, notificando por escrito al Usuario, por correo electrónico o por correo ordinario, a la dirección indicada por el Usuario y presente en la base de datos de URBANnext en la fecha de envío del desistimiento, con indicación de los motivos del desistimiento. Solo a modo de ejemplo, dicho desistimiento puede ejercerse por: (a) los cambios en las leyes y reglamentos aplicables y/o los cambios en las prácticas y orientaciones expresadas por las Autoridades competentes; (b) los cambios en los métodos, los costes y/o las tarifas de producción, comercialización y prestación de los servicios prestados, o las condiciones del mercado y/o el contexto competitivo, que puedan afectar a los aspectos económicos, de gestión, organizativos, administrativos o comerciales de los propios servicios; (c) los cambios en los requisitos técnicos, de gestión, organizativos, administrativos y/o comerciales (como, a modo de ejemplo: (i) los desarrollos o cambios técnicos, de gestión o comerciales en las plataformas informáticas y/o herramientas/aplicaciones para la prestación, uso o pago de los servicios prestados por los Proveedores; (ii) los desarrollos o cambios en las políticas comerciales y/o de distribución de los servicios prestados por URBANnext; (iii) operaciones de reestructuración y/o reorganización empresarial, o la implantación y/o revisión de procedimientos internos específicos, también con vistas a optimizar y/o estandarizar los procesos de gestión de la base de usuarios; (iv) desarrollos o cambios en la gestión del riesgo de fraude y/o en las políticas y/o procesos de protección, seguridad y tratamiento de datos de los usuarios).
14.9 URBANnext podrá suspender el uso de la App URBI y de los Servicios URBI en cualquier momento y con efecto inmediato si existe un motivo justificado. A título enunciativo y no limitativo, los Servicios URBI podrán ser suspendidos en caso de comunicación de datos erróneos y/o falsos y/o que hayan dejado de ser válidos en la solicitud de Servicios de Movilidad de Deep Integration, o de no comunicar, durante el transcurso de la relación, cambios en los datos facilitados en el momento del registro inicial; de no abonar los importes debidos en los plazos aplicables, incluyendo el caso de no abonar por cualquier motivo los cargos en la Cartera y/o a través del medio de pago facilitado por el Usuario a URBANnext. URBANnext informará al Usuario de la suspensión de los Servicios URBI con 7 (siete) días de antelación, cuando sea razonablemente posible. Tras el resultado de las aclaraciones que el Usuario pueda proporcionar a URBANnext y/o de las investigaciones posteriores realizadas por URBANnext, éste podrá restablecer los Servicios URBI. Si, por el contrario, URBANnext considera que existen los motivos justificados antes mencionados, podrá rescindir el Contrato correspondiente, de acuerdo con y con los efectos previstos en el artículo 14.8 anterior, o, si se cumplen las condiciones, rescindir el Contrato de acuerdo con el artículo 1456 del Código Civil italiano y poner fin a los Servicios URBI, de acuerdo con y con los efectos previstos en el artículo 14.10 siguiente.
14.10 Las Partes acuerdan que, sin perjuicio del derecho de URBANnext a la indemnización por daños y perjuicios y todo lo demás previsto en la ley y en el presente Contrato, la relación contractual relativa a los Servicios URBI podrá ser rescindida por URBANnext en virtud del artículo 1456 del Código Civil italiano: 1. En cualquier caso de violación comprobada del pago puntual de todas las cantidades debidas por el Usuario; 2. En cualquier caso de uso fraudulento de la App URBI; 3. Si el Usuario no cumple con sus obligaciones previstas en los artículos 4.4, 4.5, 4.6, 6.2 y 6.3 del presente Contrato.
14.11 En cualquier caso, URBANnext se reserva el derecho a obtener del Usuario una indemnización por los daños y perjuicios sufridos como consecuencia de la violación de estos Términos y Condiciones y/o de la normativa aplicable.
15. Modificación de los presentes Términos y Condiciones
15.1 Estos Términos y Condiciones y las modificaciones y adiciones posteriores constituyen el acuerdo completo entre el Usuario y URBANnext en relación con URBI y los Servicios URBI, y sustituyen todas las comunicaciones anteriores o actuales.
15.2 URBANnext se reserva el derecho de modificar unilateralmente estos Términos y Condiciones, también en perjuicio del Usuario, con especial referencia a la provisión de cualesquiera tarifas y costes por los Servicios prestados, en presencia de las siguientes razones justificadas, que serán comunicadas en detalle con ocasión de cualquier modificación: (a) los cambios en las leyes y reglamentos aplicables y/o los cambios en las prácticas y orientaciones expresadas por las Autoridades competentes; (b) los cambios en los métodos, los costes y/o las tarifas de producción, comercialización y prestación de los servicios prestados, o las condiciones del mercado y/o el contexto competitivo, que puedan afectar a los aspectos económicos, de gestión, organizativos, administrativos o comerciales de los propios servicios; (c) los cambios en los requisitos técnicos, de gestión, organizativos, administrativos y/o comerciales (como, a modo de ejemplo: (i) los desarrollos o cambios técnicos, de gestión o comerciales en las plataformas informáticas y/o herramientas/aplicaciones para la prestación, uso o pago de los servicios prestados por los Proveedores; (ii) los desarrollos o cambios en las políticas comerciales y/o de distribución de los servicios prestados por URBANnext; (iii) operaciones de reestructuración y/o reorganización empresarial, o la implantación y/o revisión de procedimientos internos específicos, también con vistas a optimizar y/o estandarizar los procesos de gestión de la base de usuarios; (iv) desarrollos o cambios en la gestión del riesgo de fraude y/o en las políticas y/o procesos de protección, seguridad y tratamiento de datos de los usuarios).
15.3 Cualquier modificación se comunicará al Usuario por escrito como "Propuesta de modificación unilateral del Contrato", indicando: (a) los motivos concretos que justifican la propuesta de modificación; (b) la fecha de entrada en vigor de la modificación, que no podrá ser inferior a 2 (dos) meses desde la fecha de recepción de la comunicación; (c) el derecho del Usuario a ejercer el derecho de desistimiento, si no tiene intención de adherirse a la citada propuesta y, (d) cualquier otra información exigida por la normativa vigente.
15.4 La propuesta de modificación unilateral de estos Términos y Condiciones se enviará al Usuario por correo electrónico, a la dirección válidamente comunicada por éste a URBANnext, o, en su defecto, por correo ordinario, a la dirección indicada por el Usuario y presente en la base de datos de URBANnext en la fecha de envío de la propuesta. El Usuario podrá desistir de los Términos y Condiciones, sin cargo ni penalización, dentro del plazo indicado para la propuesta de modificación, notificándolo a URBANnext por correo electrónico, a la dirección indicada en la propuesta de modificación unilateral, o por correo ordinario, a la dirección indicada en estos Términos y Condiciones. Transcurrido dicho plazo sin que el Usuario comunique su desistimiento, se considerarán aceptadas las modificaciones propuestas.
15.5 Lo anterior no se aplicará en caso de cambios impuestos por normas o reglamentos obligatorios o medidas de las autoridades competentes, que se aplicarán, incluso sin previo aviso, de acuerdo con las disposiciones de las normas o medidas pertinentes.
16. Servicios de terceros y Proveedores
16.1 URBI puede incluir enlaces a servicios, sitios web o recursos proporcionados y gestionados independientemente por terceros.
16.2 URBANnext no se responsabiliza ni ofrece ninguna garantía sobre la información proporcionada por terceros, ni sobre el contenido, disponibilidad, exactitud y funcionamiento de los sitios, recursos y/o servicios de terceros, incluidos los Servicios de Movilidad.
16.3 El Usuario reconoce que, dada la ajenidad de URBANnext, el punto de contacto para cualquier pregunta o reclamación relacionada con los Servicios de Movilidad es el proveedor que proporciona el Servicio de Movilidad individual en URBI.
16.5 URBANnext informa a los Usuarios de que las marcas y logotipos que distinguen a los Servicios de Movilidad son propiedad exclusiva de los respectivos Proveedores, y que la reproducción de dichos signos distintivos dentro de URBI tiene una finalidad meramente descriptiva, de acuerdo con el artículo 21, apartado 1, letra c del Código de la Propiedad Industrial (Decreto Legislativo n.º 30 10 de febrero de 2005). Se prohíbe expresamente al Usuario reproducir o utilizar de cualquier forma las marcas y logotipos de los Proveedores sin la autorización expresa de estos últimos.
17. Tratamiento de los datos personales
17.1 URBANnext reconoce la importancia de proteger la privacidad y los derechos de los Usuarios que utilizan los Servicios URBI.
17.2 En el momento de la creación de la Cuenta URBI, a través de la Política de Privacidad elaborada y facilitada de acuerdo con el artículo 13 del RGPD, URBANnext informa a los Usuarios de la base legal, los fines y las modalidades de tratamiento de sus datos personales recogidos y tratados por URBANnext, como responsable del tratamiento, en relación con el uso de los Servicios URBI y de URBI en general. Se invita a los usuarios a leer atentamente la Política de Privacidad proporcionada por URBANnext.
17.3 URBANnext, también pone a disposición del Usuario en URBI la Política de Privacidad proporcionada por los Socios en su calidad de responsables independientes del tratamiento de los datos del Usuario en el ámbito de los Servicios de Movilidad.
18. Ley aplicable y fuero competente
18.1 Los presentes Términos y Condiciones y cualquier disputa o reclamación (incluyendo las disputas precontractuales) que surjan de o en relación con ellos o su objeto o formación, se regularán e interpretarán de acuerdo con la ley de la República Italiana.
18.2 URBANnext y el Usuario reconocen y aceptan que para la resolución de cualquier disputa o reclamación (incluidas las disputas precontractuales) que surja de o en relación con estos Términos y Condiciones o su objeto o formación, será competente el tribunal de residencia o domicilio del Usuario.
19. Reclamaciones y preguntas
19.1 En caso de preguntas relacionadas con los Términos y Condiciones de URBI y/o los Servicios de URBI, el Usuario puede ponerse en contacto con URBANnext en la dirección de correo electrónico info@urbi.co.
19.2 Por último, el Usuario podrá presentar una reclamación sobre los Servicios URBI por escrito, enviando una comunicación a la atención de URBANnext, a la dirección de correo electrónico info@urbi.co o vía PEC a la dirección urbi.it@legalmail.it.
19.3 El Usuario se compromete a colaborar con URBANnext y a proporcionar la información necesaria para investigar la reclamación a la que se refiere el artículo 21.2 anterior y resolverla lo más rápidamente posible.
20. Disposiciones finales
20.1 Si alguna disposición de estos Términos y Condiciones es considerada inválida por un tribunal de jurisdicción competente, las restantes disposiciones seguirán siendo plenamente vigentes.
20.2 Ninguna renuncia a un término de estos Términos y Condiciones se considerará una renuncia posterior o permanente a dicho término o a cualquier otro término, y el hecho de que URBANnext no haga valer un derecho o una disposición en virtud de los Términos y Condiciones no constituirá una renuncia a dicho derecho o disposición.
20.3 URBANnext podrá ceder, transferir o delegar la totalidad del Contrato o sus derechos y obligaciones mencionados anteriormente sin el consentimiento del Usuario.
20.4 No se ha creado ninguna relación de agencia, asociación, empresa conjunta o empleo como resultado de estos Términos y Condiciones.
El Usuario declara haber leído y comprendido y aceptar específicamente, también en virtud de los artículos 1341 y 1342 del Código Civil italiano, así como del artículo 33 del Código del Consumidor en la medida en que sea aplicable, las disposiciones de los artículos:
Art. 13 (Limitación de responsabilidad);
Art. 14 (Derecho de reconsideración, derecho de desistimiento, rescisión);
Art. 15 (Modificación de estos Términos y Condiciones);
Art. 18 (Ley aplicable y jurisdicción);
Art. 20.3 (Cesión del Contrato).
impressum
Letzte Aktualisierung: 5. Oktober 2021
Willkommen in der Welt der Anwendung URBI (im Folgenden "URBI-App" oder einfach "URBI" genannt), die Eigentum des Schweizer Unternehmens URBANnext SA, Nr. CHE-149.120.999, mit Sitz in Vicolo de' Calvi, 2-6830 Chiasso, Schweiz ("URBANnext") ist.
Mit dem Zugriff auf URBI mittels eines mobilen Geräts oder eines Computers über die Website www.URBI.com (im Folgenden auch nur die "Plattform" genannt) und mit der Fortsetzung der für die Erstellung Ihres URBI-Kontos erforderlichen Registrierung bestätigen Sie, dass Sie diese Nutzungsbedingungen ("Nutzungsbedingungen" oder auch "Vereinbarung") sowie die beigefügten Informationen über die Verarbeitung personenbezogener Daten ("Datenschutzrichtlinie") im Sinne der EU-Verordnung 619/2016 ("GDPR") gelesen und akzeptiert haben.
Begriffsbestimmungen
URBI Dienstleistungen: bezeichnet (i) den Dienst der Zusammenführung und Bereitstellung von Mobilitätsdienstleistungen und des Stromladeservices (wie unten definiert), die von URBANnext über URBI bereitgestellt werden, (ii) die zusätzlichen Dienstleistungen im Zusammenhang mit den verschiedenen Funktionen von URBI, sofern diese im Rahmen der Vereinbarungen mit den einzelnen Anbietern verfügbar sind, wie z. B. die Buchung und Bezahlung der Mobilitätsdienstleistungen, (iii) die Dienstleistung des Vertriebs von Mobilitätsgutscheinen, wie nachstehend definiert, zur Nutzung auf den Plattformen der Anbieter sowie (iv) die Dienstleistung des Vertriebs von Gutscheincodes, wie nachstehend definiert, zur Nutzung auf der URBI-App, wobei die von den einzelnen Anbietern autonom erbrachten Mobilitätsdienstleistungen, wie nachstehend definiert, ausdrücklich von der Definition der "URBI-Dienstleistungen" ausgeschlossen sind.
Mobilitätsdienstleistungen: bezeichnet die Dienstleistungen im Zusammenhang mit der Beförderung von Personen, die von den Anbietern unabhängig und eigenständig von URBANnext erbracht werden, die auf URBI zeitlich begrenzt zur Verfügung gestellt werden und die individuell durch die von den einzelnen Anbietern zur Verfügung gestellten Nutzungs bedingungen geregelt sind.
Stromaufladeervice: bezeichnet den Aufladeservice für Elektrofahrzeuge, der dem Nutzer von Telepass S.p.A. in seiner Eigenschaft als Anbieter von Elektromobilität über die URBI-App zur Verfügung gestellt wird, vorbehaltlich der Zustimmung des Nutzers zu den von Telepass S.p.A. bereitgestellten Allgemeinen Geschäftsbedingungen für den Aufladeservice auf der Grundlage der mit den einzelnen Betreibern von Ladestationen geschlossenen Verträge.
Nutzer: bezeichnet die volljährige natürliche Person, die nach der Registrierung auf die URBI-App zugreift und/oder die URBI-Dienstleistungen nutzt.
Anbieter: bezeichnet das Unternehmen, bei dem es sich nicht um URBANnext handelt, das die zusammengefassten Mobilitätsdienste in der URBI-App aufgrund spezifischer Verträge mit URBANnext bereitstellt. Der Anbieter des Strom-Aufladungsdienstes ist Telepass S.p.A. Der Anbieter ist allein für die Qualität der erbrachten Mobilitätsdienstleistung sowie für die Unterstützung des Nutzers verantwortlich. Auf URBI kann der Anbieter die Mobilitätsdienstleistungen auch durch Werbekampagnen vermarkten, bei denen mit Zustimmung des Nutzers und in Übereinstimmung mit den geltenden Vorschriften Rabatte, Geschenke usw. an den Nutzer gewährt werden.
Partner: bezeichnet Drittanbieter, bei denen es sich nicht um den Anbieter handelt, die ihren Mitarbeitern, Kunden und/oder Lieferanten Rabattcodes zur Verwendung bei URBI anbieten.
Verbraucherschutzgesetz: ist die Gesetzesverordnung Nr. 206 vom 6. September 2005.
URBI-Konto: bezeichnet das Konto, das der Nutzer nach Eingabe und Registrierung seiner Daten und der gewählten Zahlungsmethode (Kreditkarte oder Prepaid-Karte des Nutzers) in der URBI-App erstellt, um die URBI-Services zu nutzen.
Wallet: bezeichnet das mit dem URBI-Konto des Nutzers verbundene virtuelle Sparbuch, das, sobald es mit einem im Besitz des Nutzers befindlichen Gutscheincode aufgeladen ist, den verfügbaren Betrag angibt, den der Nutzer zum Bezug von Mobilitätsdienstleistungen und dem Stromauflade-Service ausschließlich über die URBI-App verwenden kann. Das Wallet hat Vorrang vor anderen Zahlungsmitteln, wie der Kreditkarte oder der Prepaid-Karte des Nutzers, wie in Artikel 8 weiter unten ausgeführt wird.
Deep Integration: bezeichnet die technologische Integration durch API (Application Programming Interface) eines Anbieters von Mobilitätsdienstleistungen gemäß Artikel 2.1 Buchstabe (a) unten, die es dem Nutzer ermöglicht, die Mobilitätsdienstleistung direkt in der URBI-App zu suchen, zu lokalisieren, zu buchen, zu kaufen und zu nutzen, ohne auf die Plattform des Anbieters weitergeleitet zu werden und somit ohne die Notwendigkeit einer vorherigen Registrierung auf der Plattform des Anbieters.
Light Integration: bezeichnet die technologische Integration durch API (Application Programming Interface) eines Mobilitätsdienstleisters gemäß Artikel 2.1 Buchstabe (b) unten, die es dem Nutzer ermöglicht, einen Mobilitätsdienst in der URBI-App zu suchen und zu finden, ihn auszuwählen und zur Plattform des Anbieters für die eventuelle Buchung, den Kauf und die Nutzung des Mobilitätsdienstes weitergeleitet zu werden.
Gutscheincode: gibt den alphanumerischen Code einer Geschenkkarte an, die mit dem URBI-Konto des Nutzers verbunden ist und mit der der Nutzer das Wallet aufladen kann.
Mobilitätsgutschein: ein alphanumerischer Code, der mit einem bestimmten Betrag verknüpft ist und über das URBI-Wallet oder eine andere von URBI akzeptierte Zahlungsmethode erworben werden kann. Der Mobilitätsgutschein ermöglicht es dem Nutzer, die vom jeweiligen Anbieter angebotenen Dienstleistungen im Zusammenhang mit der Beförderung von Personen ausschließlich auf der Plattform des Anbieters zu nutzen.
Rabattcode: bezeichnet den prozentualen Werbe-Rabattcode, den der Nutzer auf der Grundlage von (A) Vereinbarungen, die URBANnext mit bestimmten Partnern trifft, oder (B) nach eigenem Ermessen von URBANnext im Rahmen seiner Marketingaktivitäten gegenüber seinen aktuellen und potenziellen Nutzern erhält. Der Rabattcode muss vom Nutzer beim Kauf von Bahn-, Bus-, Fähr- und Nahverkehrstickets, beim Kauf eines Mobilitätsgutscheins oder eines Gutscheincodes manuell eingegeben werden. Rabattcodes können nicht miteinander kombiniert werden.
2. Was ist URBI?
2.1 URBI ist ein Zusammenschluss gemeinsamer Mobilitätsdienste, der es dem Nutzer ermöglicht, durch den Vergleich einer Reihe von Mobilitätsdiensten die folgenden Vorgänge auszuführen, um das gewünschte Ziel zu erreichen: (a) im Falle einer Light Integration: um die folgenden Mobilitätsdienstleistungen zu suchen und zu identifizieren: Fahrkarten für Bahn, Bus, Fähre und öffentlichen Nahverkehr, Nutzung von Taxis, und um zur Plattform des Anbieters weitergeleitet zu werden, um die gewählte Mobilitätsdienstleistung über die Plattform des Anbieters zu nutzen; (b) im Falle einer Deep Integration: Suche, Identifizierung, Buchung (falls zutreffend) und Kauf (aufgrund eines Abholauftrags zwischen URBANnext und dem Lieferanten) der folgenden Mobilitätsdienstleistungen: Vermietung von Fahrrädern, Autos, Motorrollern und Scootern sowie der Dienstleistung des Stromaufladens, die direkt auf URBI genutzt werden können, gemäß den unten in Art. 5 beschriebenen Modalitäten.
2.2 Diese Aggregation erfolgt ausschließlich zu dem Zweck, dem Nutzer den Vergleich und die Auswahl zwischen den verschiedenen Mobilitätsdiensten zu erleichtern, die in seinem geografischen Umfeld verfügbar sind. Die URBI-Dienstleistungen dürfen daher nicht mit den Mobilitätsdiensten verwechselt werden, die von den Anbietern autonom erbracht werden. Diese sind unabhängige Unternehmen, die die Mobilitätsdienste in eigener Verantwortung für den Nutzer erbringen und mit denen der Nutzer einen Vertrag über die Nutzung des jeweiligen Mobilitätsdienstes abschließt. URBANnext ist somit völlig unbeteiligt an der Erbringung von Mobilitätsdienstleistungen und der damit verbundenen Unterstützung des Nutzers durch die Anbieter.
2.3 URBANnext bietet dem Nutzer Unterstützung und Hilfe ausschließlich in Bezug auf Vorgänge und Probleme, die ausschließlich mit der Nutzung und dem Betrieb der URBI-App zusammenhängen. Der Anbieter ist allein verantwortlich für die Qualität der erbrachten Mobilitätsdienstleistung sowie für die Unterstützung und Betreuung des Nutzers bei Problemen im Zusammenhang mit der Nutzung der Mobilitätsdienstleistung.
2.4 Mit der Annahme dieser Nutzungsbedingungen erteilt der Nutzer URBANnext das Mandat, in seinem Namen und in seinem Auftrag alle Handlungen und Aktivitäten durchzuführen, die in Bezug auf die Anbieter für die Buchung (sofern zutreffend und erforderlich) und den Erwerb von Mobilitätsdienstleistungen im Rahmen einer Deep Integration erforderlich sind.
3. Registrierung und URBI-Konto
3.1 Um erstmalig auf die URBI-App zugreifen und die URBI-Services zu können, muss der Nutzer das URBI-Registrierungs- und Kontoerstellungsverfahren befolgen und korrekt abschließen.
Um sich in der URBI-App zu registrieren, muss der Nutzer: a) mindestens 18 Jahre alt sein; b) seinen Vor- und Nachnamen, seine Steuernummer, seine Telefonnummer, seine E-Mail-Adresse und optional seine Wohnanschrift angeben; c) eine der bei URBI zulässigen Zahlungsarten auswählen und die entsprechenden Anmeldedaten eingeben.
3.3 Falls der Nutzer beabsichtigt, Mobilitätsdienstleistungen in Anspruch zu nehmen, die in der Anmietung von Autos oder Motorrollern in der Deep Integration bestehen, ist außerdem ein Führerschein erforderlich, dessen Gültigkeit auf URBI durch ein technologisches System zur Identitätsprüfung überprüft wird.
3.4 Der Nutzer akzeptiert, dass die vorgenannten Daten bei URBI gespeichert und registriert werden und dass mit ihnen ein URBI-Konto erstellt wird.
3.5 Mit der Fortsetzung der Registrierung in der URBI-App erklärt der Nutzer, dass er die vorliegenden Allgemeinen Geschäftsbedingungen, auch im Sinne der Artikel 1341 und 1342 des italienischen Zivilgesetzbuches, sowie die beigefügte Datenschutzerklärung gelesen und akzeptiert hat.
3.6 Innerhalb des URBI-Kontos kann der Nutzer in der Rubrik "Verlauf" die getätigten Buchungen und Käufe verfolgen; in der Rubrik "Zahlungen“ sein verbleibendes Guthaben einsehen; in der Rubrik "Zahlungsmethoden" das Wallet mit der im URBI-Konto registrierten Zahlungsmethode aufladen; in der Rubrik "URBI-Gutschein aktivieren" das Wallet mit einem Gutscheincode aufladen.
4. Verpflichtungen des Nutzers
4.1 Um URBI nutzen zu können, muss der Nutzer diese Nutzungsbedingungen, auch im Sinne der Artikel 1341 und 1342 des italienischen Zivilgesetzbuches, sowie die Datenschutzrichtlinie akzeptieren, mit deren Annahme ein Vertrag zwischen URBANnext und dem Nutzer über die Nutzung der URBI-Dienste zustande kommt. Durch die Erstellung eines URBI-Kontos und die Nutzung der URBI-Services bestätigen und gewährleisten Sie, dass Sie das Recht, die Befugnis und die Fähigkeit haben, diesen allgemeinen Geschäftsbedingungen beizutreten.
4.2 Der Nutzer verpflichtet sich, URBI nur in Übereinstimmung mit diesen Nutzungsbedingungen und unter Wahrung der Rechte von URBANnext zu nutzen sowie alle nationalen und europäischen Gesetze und Vorschriften zu beachten, die für die Nutzung von URBI und/oder der URBI-Dienste gelten.
4.3 Der Nutzer ist dafür verantwortlich, bei der Registrierung und Nutzung von URBI wahrheitsgemäße, aktuelle und vollständige Angaben zu übermitteln und alle Voraussetzungen für die Nutzung von Mobilitätsdienstleistungen gemäß den von den einzelnen Anbietern zur Verfügung gestellten Nutzungsbedingungen sowie den Anforderungen der geltenden Gesetzgebung, z. B. hinsichtlich des für die Nutzung von Fahrzeugen erforderlichen Alters und Führerscheins, zu erfüllen.
4.4 URBI darf nur für rechtmäßige Zwecke verwendet werden. Der Nutzer erklärt daher, dass er sich nicht an einem Verhalten beteiligen wird, das nicht mit dem Zweck, der Absicht und dem Geist von URBI übereinstimmt, auch nicht durch Anregung oder Absprache mit anderen.
4.5 Der Nutzer anerkennt und verpflichtet sich: a) URBI und die URBI-Dienste nicht für unzulässige, betrügerische und/oder anderweitig nicht konforme Zwecke zu nutzen; b) bei der Nutzung der URBI-Dienste keine Schäden, Störungen oder Belästigungen für Dritte zu verursachen; c) genaue, vollständige und aktuelle Informationen bereitzustellen; d) nicht mehr als ein URBI-Konto zu erstellen; e) die Nutzung seines URBI-Kontos nicht zu gestatten und/oder es nicht an Dritte weiterzugeben.
4.6 Darüber hinaus verpflichtet sich der Nutzer, Folgendes zu unterlassen: (a) Viren oder andere schädliche Software hochzuladen, zu veröffentlichen, per E-Mail zu versenden oder anderweitig zu versenden, die den Betrieb von URBI unterbrechen, zerstören oder einschränken oder den Zugang der Nutzer zu URBI beeinträchtigen können; (b) sicherheitsrelevante Funktionen von URBI zu umgehen, zu deaktivieren oder anderweitig zu beeinträchtigen; (c) Meta-Tags oder andere verborgene Texte oder Metadaten mit dem Namen, der Marke, der URL oder dem Produktnamen von URBANnext zu verwenden; (d) den Quellcode von URBI zu entschlüsseln, zu dekompilieren, zu zerlegen, zurückzuentwickeln oder anderweitig zu versuchen, ihn zu entschlüsseln oder zu bestimmen.
5. Mobilitätsdienste bei Deep Integration
5.1 Wenn der Nutzer auf URBI einen Deep-Integration-Mobilitätsservice findet, der ihn interessiert, kann er diesen (gegebenenfalls) buchen und auf URBI kaufen, nachdem er die eingegebenen Daten überprüft und die spezifischen Nutzungsbedingungen des jeweiligen Mobilitätsdienstes sowie die Informationen über die Verarbeitung personenbezogener Daten durch den jeweiligen Anbieter, die zur Erbringung des erworbenen Mobilitätsdienstes und zur Unterstützung des Nutzers bei der Nutzung des Mobilitätsdienstes über die im Detail-Dokument im Bereich Mein Profil auf URBI angegebenen Links zugänglich sind, eingesehen und akzeptiert hat.
5.2 Bietet der Anbieter einen Auto- oder Rollerverleih an, so ist die Überprüfung der Gültigkeit des Führerscheins obligatorisch.
5.3 Nach Abschluss der in Artikel 5.2 beschriebenen Aktivitäten kann der Nutzer den Mobilitätsservice direkt nutzen, indem er das Mietfahrzeug über die URBI-App freischaltet. Gleichzeitig erhält der Anbieter alle Daten des Nutzers, die für den Abschluss des Mietvertrags zwischen dem Anbieter und dem Nutzer erforderlich sind, auch zum Zweck der Unterstützung des Nutzers.
5.4 Nach Erreichen des Endziels kann der Nutzer die Fahrt über die URBI-App beenden und muss aufgrund einer Vereinbarung zwischen URBANnext und dem Anbieter über ein Inkassomandat die Zahlung direkt über die URBI-App an URBANnext vornehmen. URBI schickt dem Nutzer im Namen und im Auftrag des Anbieters per E-Mail eine Rechnung über die Kosten der Nutzung.
5.5(A) Stromaufladeervice
Der Stromaufladeservice wird dem Nutzer von Telepass S.p.A. in seiner Eigenschaft als Anbieter von Elektromobilität ("EMP") über die URBI-App zur Verfügung gestellt, sofern der Nutzer die Nutzungsbedingungen für den Stromaufladeservice von Telepass S.p.A. auf der Grundlage der mit den Betreibern der Ladestationen ("CPO") geschlossenen Verträge akzeptiert. Der Stromaufladeservice wird an bestimmten physischen Ladestationen (den "Ladestationen") angeboten. Die Nutzung von URBI für die Inanspruchnahme des von URBANnext bereitgestellten Stromaufladeservices ist kostenlos, mit Ausnahme der Bestimmungen der allgemeinen Geschäftsbedingungen des von Telepass bereitgestellten Stromaufladeservices ("Allgemeine Geschäftsbedingungen von Telepass"). Der Stromaufladeservice über URBI wird wie folgt durchgeführt: (a) Der Nutzer hat Zugriff auf den Stromaufladeservice und kann die nächstgelegenen Aufladestationen ausfindig machen; der Nutzer kann eine Wegbeschreibung zu der Aufladestation in Bezug auf seinen Standort erhalten; (b) sofern vorgesehen, kann der Nutzer den Stromaufladeservice im Voraus buchen, wofür eine Buchungsgebühr erhoben werden kann, die gemäß den Telepass-Geschäftsbedingungen auf URBI angezeigt werden kann; (c) der Nutzer muss sich zur Aufladestation begeben; dort wählt er die Art des gewünschten Anschlusses aus und muss dann den gewünschten Aufladebetrag eingeben und bestätigen; (d) URBI bestätigt die Nutzung des elektrischen Aufladeservices erst, nachdem die Verfügbarkeit des Guthabens im Wallet überprüft wurde; (e) nach Beendigung des Aufladevorgangs werden dem Nutzer die Gesamtkosten des elektrischen Aufladeservices angezeigt, einschließlich zusätzlicher Kosten und Vertragsstrafen, sofern dies in den Telepass-Geschäftsbedingungen vorgesehen ist; (f) wenn die Zahlung aus irgendeinem Grund nicht autorisiert und/oder nicht erfolgreich abgeschlossen wird, informiert URBANnext den Nutzer über die URBI-App über die nicht autorisierte Zahlung, und Artikel 14.3 dieses Vertrags findet Anwendung.
6. Lizenz und geistiges Eigentum
6.1 Sofern der Nutzer die vorliegenden Bedigungen einhält, ist er berechtigt, eine Kopie der unterstützten Version der URBI-App auf seine Plattform herunterzuladen und zu installieren, sich zu registrieren und ein URBI-Konto einzurichten sowie die URBI-Services ausschließlich für persönliche und nicht-kommerzielle Zwecke zu nutzen.
6.2 Der Nutzer erkennt an, dass alle Informationen, Daten, Software, Musik, Sounds, Fotos und Bilder, Videos und alle anderen Inhalte, die auf URBI vorhanden sind und/oder mit den URBI-Diensten in Verbindung stehen, das ausschließliche Eigentum von URBANnext und seinen Rechtsnachfolgern sind. Der Nutzer erwirbt daher keinerlei Rechte in Bezug auf URBI und/oder die URBI-Dienste, außer dem Recht, diese in Übereinstimmung mit diesen Bedingungen zu nutzen.
Der Nutzer erklärt, dass ihm bekannt ist, dass es ihm nicht gestattet ist: a) URBI und/oder die URBI-Dienstleistungen für irgendeinen Zweck zu kopieren, zu verändern oder zu vertreiben; b) URBI und/oder die URBI-Services an Dritte zu übertragen, unterzulizenzieren, zu vermieten, zu verleihen, zu verleasen oder zu vertreiben; c) URBI und/oder die URBI-Dienstleistungen zurückzuentwickeln, zu dekompilieren oder davon abgeleitete Produkte zu erstellen; d) URBI und/oder die URBI-Dienstleistungen in irgendeiner Weise zu nutzen, die mit URBANnext konkurriert; e) die Funktionalitäten von URBI und/oder den URBI-Dienstleistungen auf seinem URBI-Konto Dritten zugänglich zu machen.
6.4 URBANnext ist Inhaber der Rechte an geistigem und gewerblichem Eigentum in Bezug auf URBI (einschließlich Texte, Bilder, Grafiken, Navigationsstruktur und Informationen) und besitzt daher das ausschließliche Recht, die Nutzungsrechte daran auszuüben, insbesondere das Recht auf Vervielfältigung, Verbreitung, Veröffentlichung und Umgestaltung.
6.5 Die Erlaubnis des Nutzers, auf URBI zuzugreifen und es zu nutzen, bedeutet keinen vollständigen oder teilweisen Verzicht, keine Übertragung, Lizenzierung oder Abtretung von geistigen oder gewerblichen Eigentumsrechten.
6.6 Der Nutzer erklärt, dass ihm bekannt ist, dass es verboten ist, den Inhalt von URBI zu löschen oder in irgendeiner Weise zu verändern und/oder den darin enthaltenen Inhalt zu kopieren, zu vervielfältigen oder in irgendeiner Weise zu verwerten.
7. Kosten und Zahlungen
7.1 Die Installation und Nutzung der URBI-Dienstleistungen auf der URBI-App ist kostenlos. Die einzigen Beträge, die der Nutzer über URBI bezahlt, sind die Gebühren für den Erwerb von Mobilitätsdienstleistungen in Deep Integration, die URBANnext über die URBI-App im Namen und auf Rechnung des Anbieters auf der Grundlage von Verträgen mit diesem einzieht, sowie etwaige Buchungsgebühren und/oder Vertragsstrafen, die von den Anbietern in Bezug auf die einzelnen Mobilitätsdienstleistungen erhoben werden können. Diese Beträge werden ausschließlich von den einzelnen Anbietern festgelegt und sind in ihren jeweiligen Geschäftsbedingungen enthalten, die auch über die im Detail-Dokument angegebenen Links zugänglich sind. URBI erhebt keine zusätzlichen Gebühren und ist von jeglicher Preispolitik im Zusammenhang mit Mobilitätsdienstleistungen völlig unabhängig.
7.2 Nach Abschluss der Nutzung des Mobilitätsdienstes ist der Nutzer daher verpflichtet, den angegebenen Betrag über sein Wallet zu bezahlen. Nur wenn das Guthaben im Wallet nicht ausreicht, kann der Nutzer die Zahlung mit einer der auf URBI zugelassenen Zahlungsarten ergänzen.
7.3 URBI schickt dem Nutzer per E-Mail im Namen des Anbieters die Rechnung für den in Deep Integration in Anspruch genommenen Mobilitätsdienst.
7.4 Der Nutzer nimmt zur Kenntnis, dass einige Anbieter für bestimmte Mobilitätsdienstleistungen eine Vorabgenehmigung in Höhe eines vom Anbieter festgelegten variablen Betrags vorsehen können.
8. Wallet
8.1 URBI stellt dem Nutzer ein digitales Sparbuch, Wallet genannt, zur Verfügung, das mit dem URBI-Konto verbunden ist, um die Gebühren für die Mobilitätsdienste sowie etwaige Buchungsgebühren oder Vertragsstrafen, die von den Anbietern in Bezug auf die einzelnen Mobilitätsdienste erhoben werden, zu begleichen.
8.2 Der Nutzer kann das Wallet mit der im URBI-Konto registrierten Zahlungsmethode im Bereich "Zahlungsmethoden" oder durch Einlösen eines Gutscheincodes im Bereich "URBI-Gutschein aktivieren" aufladen.
8.3 Im Bereich "Zahlen" kann der Nutzer sein Restguthaben einsehen, d.h. den Betrag, der ihm zur Verfügung steht, um Mobilitätsdienstleistungen und den Stromaufladeservice ausschließlich über die URBI-App zu erwerben. Das Restguthaben des Wallet, das mit dem URBI-Konto eines Nutzers verbunden ist, kann nicht auf ein anderes URBI-Konto übertragen werden.
8.4 Das Wallet hat Vorrang vor anderen Zahlungsarten. Das auf der Wallet verfügbare Guthaben hat kein Verfallsdatum und kann daher vom Nutzer jederzeit verwendet werden. In allen Fällen einer Vertragsbeendigung werden etwaige Beträge, die sich im Wallet befinden, von URBANnext so schnell wie möglich dem vom Nutzer auf URBI verwendeten Zahlungssystem wieder gutgeschrieben.
8.5 Wenn der Kaufpreis eines bestimmten Mobilitätsdienstes höher ist als das Guthaben im Wallet, muss der Nutzer den Differenzbetrag mit einer anderen auf URBI akzeptierten Zahlungsmethode begleichen.
9. Gutscheincode
9.1 URBI kann den Nutzern alphanumerische Codes zur Verfügung stellen, die Geschenkkarten entsprechen, die mit dem URBI-Konto des Nutzers verbunden werden können, und die einen bestimmten Betrag enthalten, mit dem der Nutzer das Wallet aufladen kann.
9.2 Der Nutzer kann über die Seite "URBI-Gutschein aktivieren" Guthaben auf das Wallet aufladen, indem er den in seinem Besitz befindlichen Gutscheincode eingibt.
9.3 Die Gutschein-Codes können vom Nutzer ausschließlich bei URBI eingelöst werden und sind 12 (zwölf) Monate ab dem letzten Kauf von Mobilitätsdienstleistungen gültig, es sei denn, dem Nutzer werden beim Kauf oder Erhalt des Gutschein-Codes besondere Bedingungen mitgeteilt.
10. Mobilitätsgutschein
10.1 In Bereich "Shop" des URBI-Kontos kann der Nutzer die Werbeangebote der Anbieter einsehen und mit dem Guthaben im Wallet oder einer anderen auf URBI akzeptierten Zahlungsmethode oder dem Rabattcode einen Mobilitätsgutschein, d.h. einen alphanumerischen Code, der mit einem bestimmten Betrag verbunden ist, erwerben.
10.2 Der Mobilitätsgutschein kann nur auf der Website und/oder der Plattform des Anbieters verwendet werden, auf die er sich bezieht, und zwar gemäß den vom Anbieter festgelegten und in der Rubrik "Info" des Shops im URBI-Konto zur Verfügung gestellten Bedingungen (einschließlich, als Beispiel, der Gültigkeitsdauer und/oder des geografischen Gebiets desselben).
11. Werbekampagnen
In Bereich "Shop" des URBI-Kontos kann der Nutzer auch die Rabattcodes einsehen, d.h. die prozentualen Werberabatte, die der Nutzer auf der Grundlage von (A) Vereinbarungen, die URBI mit bestimmten Partnern getroffen hat, oder (B) nach Ermessen von URBANnext im Rahmen seiner Marketingaktivitäten gegenüber seinen aktuellen und potenziellen Nutzern erhält.
11.2 Der Rabattcode muss vom Nutzer beim Kauf von Bahn-, Bus-, Fähr- und Nahverkehrstickets, beim Kauf eines Mobilitätsgutscheins oder eines Gutscheincodes manuell eingegeben werden.
11.3 Rabattcodes sind nicht miteinander kombinierbar und haben das von URBANnext angegebene unterschiedliche Verfallsdatum.
12. Nachrichten und Mitteilungen
12.1 Im Rahmen der URBI-Dienste kann der Nutzer Nachrichten über Hinweise und/oder andere Mitteilungen direkt über URBI ("Push-Nachrichten") oder per Textnachricht (SMS), Multimedia-Nachricht (MMS) oder E-Mail an die vom Nutzer bei URBANnext auf URBI angegebenen Kontakte erhalten.
12.2 Der Nutzer kann die Einstellungen der Push-Nachrichten jederzeit kontrollieren und verwalten, indem er sie über URBI und/oder über die Einstellungen seiner Plattform aktiviert oder deaktiviert, außer im Fall von wichtigen Servicewarnungen und Nachrichten administrativer Art.
13. Haftungsbeschränkungungsklausel
13.1 URBANnext kann nicht für Folgen verantwortlich gemacht werden, die sich aus der Nichtverfügbarkeit von URBI oder der URBI-Dienstleistungen aufgrund von technischen Problemen ergeben, die außerhalb des Einflussbereichs von URBANnext liegen, wie z. B. aber nicht darauf beschränkt, mechanische Störungen, Unterbrechungen von Telefon- und Kommunikationsleitungen, "Leitungsgeräusche", Nichtverfügbarkeit der Verbindung und technische Probleme im Zusammenhang mit dem Gerät des Nutzers, für Schäden am Computer oder Mobilgerät des Nutzers, Datenverluste, Sachschäden oder andere Schäden, die sich aus der Nutzung von URBI und/oder der URBI-Dienste entgegen diesen Bedingungen ergeben.
13.2 URBANnext, seine leitenden Angestellten, Mitarbeiter oder Vertreter haften in keinem Fall für indirekte, zufällige, besondere, strafbewehrte oder Folgeschäden jeglicher Art, die sich aus oder in Verbindung mit der Nutzung von URBI und/oder den URBI-Diensten durch den Nutzer unter Verletzung dieser Regeln und Bedingungen ergeben.
13.3 Jegliche Nutzung von URBI, der URBI-Dienstleistungen und/oder der Mobilitätsleistungen, die gegen diese Nutzungsbedingungen und die geltenden Vorschriften verstößt, ist untersagt und verpflichtet den Nutzer, URBANnext, seine gesetzlichen Vertreter und seine Mitarbeiter von allen nachteiligen Folgen freizustellen: a) die sich aus dem Verstoß gegen das in diesem Artikel vorgesehene Verbot ergeben; oder b) die, auch indirekt, aus der Nutzung von URBI und/oder der Dienste von URBI unter Verstoß gegen die vorliegenden Nutzungsbedingungen resultieren; c) die sich auf die Unvollständigkeit und/oder die Nichtaktualisierung der vom Nutzer bereitgestellten Informationen beziehen, der allein für deren Vollständigkeit und Richtigkeit verantwortlich ist.
14. Recht auf erneute Prüfung, Rücktrittsrecht, Kündigung)
14.1 URBANnext und der Nutzer erkennen an, dass es sich bei dem auf diese Weise unterzeichneten Vertrag um einen "Fernabsatzvertrag" handelt.
14.2 Diese Nutzungsbedingungen gelten auf unbestimmte Zeit, vorbehaltlich der Bestimmungen der folgenden Absätze des vorliegenden Artikels 14.
14.3 Gemäß den einschlägigen Bestimmungen des Verbraucherschutzgesetzes kann der Nutzer innerhalb von 14 Tagen ab dem Datum des Vertragsabschlusses (das mit dem Datum der Registrierung des Nutzers bei URBI zusammenfällt) vom Vertrag zurücktreten, ohne dass ihm eine Vertragsstrafe oder Kosten entstehen. Vor Ablauf der oben genannten Frist kann der Nutzer URBANnext schriftlich per Einschreiben mit Rückschein an die Adresse Corso Italia, 3 - 20122 Mailand (MI) oder per E-Mail an support@urbi.co darüber informieren, dass er von seinem Widerrufsrecht Gebrauch machen möchte. Der Nutzer, der das in diesem Artikel vorgesehene Rücktrittsrecht ausübt, muss nur die Gebühren für die bis zum Zeitpunkt der wirksamen Sperrung des URBI-Kontos in Anspruch genommenen Mobilitätsdienste zahlen.
14.4 Vorbehaltlich der Bestimmungen in Artikel 14.3 kann der Nutzer jederzeit von den vorliegenden Nutzungsbedingungen zurücktreten, ohne dass ihm dadurch Kosten entstehen. Dies geschieht durch eine spezifische Mitteilung, die direkt an URBANnext über die in Artikel 14.2 angegebene E-Mail-Adresse oder das Postfach geschickt wird.
14.5 Im Falle des Rücktritts des Nutzers verpflichtet sich URBANnext, das URBI-Konto innerhalb von 15 Tagen kostenlos für den Nutzer zu deaktivieren und die Daten innerhalb von 3 Monaten zu löschen, vorbehaltlich der gesetzlich vorgeschriebenen Speicherung der Daten und/oder der Verpflichtungen gegenüber dem Anbieter. Der Nutzer, der das in diesem Artikel vorgesehene Rücktrittsrecht ausübt, muss nur die Gebühren für die bis zum Zeitpunkt der effektiven Deaktivierung des URBI-Kontos in Anspruch genommenen Mobilitätsdienstleistungen zahlen.
14.6 URBANnext hat das Recht, von den vorliegenden Bedingungen zurückzutreten, indem es dem Nutzer mindestens 2 Monate im Voraus eine schriftliche Mitteilung per E-Mail oder per Post an die vom Nutzer angegebene und zum Zeitpunkt der Absendung des Rücktritts in der URBANnext-Datenbank vorhandene Adresse schickt.
14.7 Zum Zeitpunkt des Inkrafttretens der Vertragskündigung deaktiviert URBANnext die Nutzung des URBI-Kontos durch den Nutzer. Dies hat keine Auswirkungen auf die Verpflichtung des Nutzers, URBANnext die fälligen Beträge als Gegenleistung für die über URBI genutzten Mobilitätsdienste zum Zeitpunkt der tatsächlichen Sperrung des URBI-Kontos zu zahlen.
14.8 Bei Vorliegen eines berechtigten Grundes kann URBANnext gemäß Artikel 33 Absatz 2 des Verbraucherschutzgesetzes mit sofortiger Wirkung vom Vertrag zurücktreten, indem es den Nutzer schriftlich per E-Mail oder per Post an die vom Nutzer angegebene und zum Zeitpunkt der Absendung des Rücktritts in der Datenbank von URBANnext vorhandene Adresse benachrichtigt und die Gründe für den Rücktritt angibt. Ein solcher Rücktritt kann beispielsweise geltend gemacht werden für: (a) Änderungen der geltenden Gesetze und Vorschriften und/oder Änderungen der von den zuständigen Behörden geäußerten Praktiken und Leitlinien; b) Änderungen der Methoden, Kosten und/oder Gebühren für die Herstellung, Vermarktung und Erbringung der erbrachten Dienstleistungen oder der Marktbedingungen und/oder des Wettbewerbsumfelds, die sich auf die wirtschaftlichen, verwaltungstechnischen, organisatorischen, administrativen oder kommerziellen Aspekte der Dienstleistungen selbst auswirken können; c) Änderungen der technischen, verwaltungstechnischen, organisatorischen, administrativen und/oder kommerziellen Anforderungen (wie z. B. (i) Entwicklungen oder technische, verwaltungstechnische oder kommerzielle Änderungen der IT-Plattformen und/oder Tools/Anwendungen für die Erbringung, Nutzung oder Bezahlung der von den Anbietern erbrachten Dienstleistungen; (ii) Entwicklungen oder Änderungen der Geschäftspolitik und/oder des Vertriebs der von URBANnext erbrachten Dienstleistungen; (iii) Umstrukturierungs- und/oder Reorganisationsmaßnahmen des Unternehmens oder die Einführung und/oder Überarbeitung spezifischer interner Verfahren, auch im Zusammenhang mit der Optimierung und/oder Standardisierung von Prozessen zur Verwaltung der Nutzerbasis; (iv) Entwicklungen oder Änderungen von Strategien und/oder Verfahren für das Management von Betrugsrisiken und/oder den Schutz, die Sicherheit und die Verarbeitung von Nutzerdaten).
14.9 URBANnext kann die Nutzung der URBI-App und der URBI-Services jederzeit und mit sofortiger Wirkung aussetzen, wenn ein berechtigter Grund vorliegt. Die URBI-Services können beispielsweise und ohne Einschränkung ausgesetzt werden, wenn bei der Beantragung der Deep Integration Mobilitätsdienste unrichtige und/oder falsche und/oder ungültige Daten angegeben werden, oder wenn im Laufe der Geschäftsbeziehung die Änderung der bei der Erstregistrierung angegebenen Daten nicht mitgeteilt wird; wenn die fälligen Beträge nicht innerhalb der geltenden Fristen bezahlt werden, einschließlich der Hypothese, dass die Gebühren aus irgendeinem Grund nicht über die Geldbörse und/oder die vom Nutzer an URBANnext angegebene Zahlungsmethode abgewickelt werden können. URBANnext informiert den Nutzer über die Einstellung der URBI-Services mit einer Frist von 7 (sieben) Tagen, sofern dies möglich ist. URBANnext kann die URBI-Dienste nach Klärung durch den Nutzer und/oder nach weiteren Untersuchungen durch URBANnext wiederherstellen. Wenn URBANnext hingegen der Ansicht ist, dass die oben genannten berechtigten Gründe vorliegen, kann sie gemäß und mit den in Art. 14.8 oben genannten Auswirkungen vom betreffenden Vertrag zurücktreten oder, falls die Voraussetzungen vorliegen, den Vertrag gemäß Art. 1456 des italienischen Zivilgesetzbuches kündigen und die URBI-Dienstleistungen gemäß und mit den in Art. 14.10 unten genannten Auswirkungen beenden.
14.10 Die Parteien vereinbaren, dass URBANnext vorbehaltlich des Rechts von URBANnext auf Schadensersatz und aller sonstigen gesetzlichen und vertraglichen Bestimmungen das Vertragsverhältnis bezüglich der URBI-Services gemäß Artikel 1456 des italienischen Zivilgesetzbuches kündigen kann: 1. In jedem Fall der nachweislichen Verletzung der pünktlichen Zahlung aller fälligen Beträge durch den Nutzer; 2. Im Falle einer betrügerischen Nutzung der URBI-App; 3. wenn der Nutzer seinen vertraglichen Verpflichtungen gemäß den Artikeln 4.4, 4.5, 4.6, 6.2 und 6.3 nicht nachkommt.
14.11 URBANnext hat in jedem Fall das Recht, vom Nutzer eine Entschädigung für den Schaden zu verlangen, der durch die Verletzung der vorliegenden Bedingungen und/oder der geltenden Vorschriften entstanden ist.
15. Änderung der vorliegenden Nutzungsbedingungen
15.1 Diese Nutzungsbedingungen und ihre späteren Änderungen und Ergänzungen stellen die gesamte Vereinbarung zwischen dem Nutzer und URBANnext in Bezug auf URBI und die URBI-Dienste dar und ersetzen alle vorherigen oder gleichzeitigen Vereinbarungen.
15.2 URBANnext behält sich das Recht vor, die vorliegenden Nutzungsbedingungen einseitig zu ändern, auch in einer für den Nutzer ungünstigen Weise, insbesondere in Bezug auf die Bereitstellung von Gebühren und Kosten für die erbrachten Dienstleistungen, wenn die folgenden berechtigten Gründe vorliegen, die bei jeder Änderung ausführlich mitgeteilt werden: (a) Änderungen der geltenden Gesetze und Vorschriften und/oder Änderungen der von den zuständigen Behörden geäußerten Praktiken und Leitlinien; b) Änderungen der Methoden, Kosten und/oder Gebühren für die Herstellung, Vermarktung und Erbringung der erbrachten Dienstleistungen oder der Marktbedingungen und/oder des Wettbewerbsumfelds, die sich auf die wirtschaftlichen, verwaltungstechnischen, organisatorischen, administrativen oder kommerziellen Aspekte der Dienstleistungen selbst auswirken können; c) Änderungen der technischen, verwaltungstechnischen, organisatorischen, administrativen und/oder kommerziellen Anforderungen (wie z. B. (i) Entwicklungen oder technische, verwaltungstechnische oder kommerzielle Änderungen der IT-Plattformen und/oder Tools/Anwendungen für die Erbringung, Nutzung oder Bezahlung der von den Anbietern erbrachten Dienstleistungen; (ii) Entwicklungen oder Änderungen der Geschäftspolitik und/oder des Vertriebs der von URBANnext erbrachten Dienstleistungen; (iii) Umstrukturierungs- und/oder Reorganisationsmaßnahmen des Unternehmens oder die Einführung und/oder Überarbeitung spezifischer interner Verfahren, auch im Zusammenhang mit der Optimierung und/oder Standardisierung von Prozessen zur Verwaltung der Nutzerbasis; (iv) Entwicklungen oder Änderungen von Strategien und/oder Verfahren für das Management von Betrugsrisiken und/oder den Schutz, die Sicherheit und die Verarbeitung von Nutzerdaten).
15.3 Alle Änderungen werden dem Nutzer schriftlich als "Vorschlag zur einseitigen Vertragsänderung" unter Angabe des Inhalts mitgeteilt: (a) die besonderen Gründe, die die vorgeschlagene Änderung rechtfertigen; (b) das Datum des Inkrafttretens der Änderung, das nicht weniger als 2 (zwei) Monate ab dem Datum des Eingangs der Mitteilung betragen darf; (c) das Recht des Nutzers, von seinem Widerrufsrecht Gebrauch zu machen, wenn er nicht beabsichtigt, dem oben genannten Vorschlag zu folgen, und (d) alle weiteren Informationen, die nach den geltenden Rechtsvorschriften erforderlich sind.
15.4 Die vorgeschlagene einseitige Änderung dieser Bedingungen wird dem Nutzer per E-Mail an die von ihm an URBANnext mitgeteilte Adresse oder andernfalls per Post an die vom Nutzer angegebene und zum Zeitpunkt der Übermittlung des Vorschlags in der URBANnext-Datenbank gespeicherte Adresse übermittelt. Der Nutzer kann innerhalb der in der vorgeschlagenen Änderung angegebenen Frist von den Nutzungsbedingungen zurücktreten, indem er URBANnext per E-Mail an die in der vorgeschlagenen einseitigen Änderung angegebene Adresse oder auf dem Postweg an die in den Nutzungsbedingungen angegebene Adresse benachrichtigt. Nach Ablauf dieser Frist, wenn der Nutzer keinen Rücktritt erklärt hat, gelten die vorgeschlagenen Änderungen als angenommen.
15.5 Dies gilt nicht im Falle von Änderungen, die durch zwingende Rechts- oder Verwaltungsvorschriften oder Maßnahmen der zuständigen Behörden vorgeschrieben sind; diese gelten auch ohne Ankündigung gemäß den Bestimmungen der einschlägigen Vorschriften oder Maßnahmen.
16. Dienste von Dritten und Lieferanten
16.1 URBI kann Links zu Dienstleistungen, Websites oder Ressourcen enthalten, die von Dritten bereitgestellt und unabhängig verwaltet werden.
16.2 URBANnext ist weder für die von Dritten bereitgestellten Informationen noch für den Inhalt, die Verfügbarkeit, die Genauigkeit und das Funktionieren von Websites, Ressourcen und/oder Diensten Dritter, einschließlich Mobilitätsdiensten, verantwortlich und übernimmt keine Garantie dafür.
16.3 In Anbetracht der Tatsache, dass URBANnext ein Fremdunternehmen ist, erkennt der Nutzer an, dass der Ansprechpartner für Fragen oder Beschwerden in Bezug auf die Mobilitätsdienste der Anbieter ist, der den jeweiligen Mobilitätsdienst auf URBI zur Verfügung stellt.
16.5 URBANnext weist die Nutzer darauf hin, dass die Marken und Logos, die die Mobilitätsdienste kennzeichnen, ausschließliches Eigentum der jeweiligen Anbieter sind und dass die Wiedergabe dieser unterscheidungskräftigen Zeichen innerhalb von URBI gemäß Artikel 21, Absatz 1, Buchstabe c des Gesetzes über das gewerbliche Eigentum (Gesetzesverordnung Nr. 30 vom 10. Februar 2005) lediglich zu beschreibenden Zwecken erfolgt. Es ist dem Nutzer ausdrücklich untersagt, die Marken und Logos der Anbieter ohne deren ausdrückliche Genehmigung zu kopieren oder in irgendeiner Weise zu verwenden.
17. Verarbeitung von personenbezogenen Daten
17.1 URBANnext ist sich der Bedeutung des Schutzes der Privatsphäre und der Rechte von Nutzern bewusst, die URBI-Dienste nutzen.
17.2 Bei der Erstellung des URBI-Kontos informiert URBANnext die Nutzer in der gemäß Artikel 13 der DSGVO erstellten und bereitgestellten Datenschutzerklärung über die Rechtsgrundlage, den Zweck und die Methoden der Verarbeitung ihrer personenbezogenen Daten, die von URBANnext in seiner Eigenschaft als für die Datenverarbeitung Verantwortlicher im Zusammenhang mit der Nutzung der URBI-Services und ganz allgemein von URBI erfasst und verarbeitet werden. Die Nutzer werden gebeten, die von URBANnext zur Verfügung gestellten Datenschutzbestimmungen sorgfältig zu lesen.
17.3 URBANnext stellt dem Nutzer auf URBI auch die Datenschutzrichtlinien zur Verfügung, die von den Partnern in ihrer Eigenschaft als eigenständige Datenverantwortliche für die Daten des Nutzers im Rahmen der Mobilitätsdienste bereitgestellt werden.
18. Anwendbares Recht und zuständiges Gericht
18.1 Diese Geschäftsbedingungen und alle Streitigkeiten oder Ansprüche (einschließlich vorvertraglicher Streitigkeiten), die sich aus ihnen oder in Verbindung mit ihnen oder ihrem Gegenstand oder ihrem Zustandekommen ergeben, unterliegen dem Recht der Italienischen Republik und sind nach diesem auszulegen.
18.2 URBANnext und der Nutzer erkennen an und erklären sich damit einverstanden, dass für die Beilegung von Streitigkeiten oder Ansprüchen (einschließlich vorvertraglicher Streitigkeiten), die sich aus oder im Zusammenhang mit diesen Geschäftsbedingungen oder deren Gegenstand oder Zustandekommen ergeben, das Gericht am Wohnsitz oder Sitz des Nutzers zuständig ist.
19. Beanstandungen und Fragen
19.1 Wenn der Nutzer Fragen zu den URBI-Nutzungsbedingungen und/oder den URBI-Diensten hat, kann er URBANnext unter der E-Mail-Adresse info@urbi.co kontaktieren.
19.2 Schließlich kann der Nutzer eine Beschwerde hinsichtlich der Dienstleistungen von URBI schriftlich einreichen, indem er eine Mitteilung an URBANnext, an die E-Mail-Adresse info@urbi.co oder über PEC an die Adresseurbi.it@legalmail.it schicken.
19.3 Der Nutzer verpflichtet sich, mit URBANnext zusammenzuarbeiten und die notwendigen Informationen zur Verfügung zu stellen, um die in Artikel 21.2 genannte Beschwerde zu untersuchen und so schnell wie möglich zu lösen.
20. Schlussbestimmungen
20.1 Sollte eine Bestimmung der vorliegenden Nutzungsbedingungen von einem zuständigen Gericht für ungültig erklärt werden, bleiben die übrigen Bestimmungen in vollem Umfang in Kraft und wirksam.
20.2 Ein Verzicht auf eine Klausel dieser Nutzungsbedingungen gilt nicht als weiterer oder dauerhafter Verzicht auf diese Klausel oder eine andere Klausel, und das Versäumnis von URBANnext, ein Recht oder eine Bestimmung der Nutzungsbedingungen durchzusetzen, gilt nicht als Verzicht auf dieses Recht oder diese Bestimmung.
20.3 URBANnext kann den gesamten Vertrag oder seine oben genannten Rechte und Verbindlichkeiten ohne Zustimmung des Nutzers abtreten, übertragen oder delegieren.
20.4 Durch diese Allgemeinen Geschäftsbedingungen wird keine Agentur, Partnerschaft, kein Joint Venture und kein Arbeitsverhältnis begründet.
Der Nutzer erklärt, dass er die Bestimmungen der Artikel 1341 und 1342 des italienischen Zivilgesetzbuches sowie des Artikels 33 des Verbraucherschutzgesetzes gelesen und verstanden hat und ausdrücklich akzeptiert, soweit diese anwendbar sind:
Art. 13 ( Haftungsbeschränkungsklausel);
Art. 14 (Recht auf erneute Prüfung, Rücktrittsrecht, Kündigung);
Art. 15 (Änderung der vorliegenden Nutzungsbedingungen);
Art. 18 (Anwendbares Recht und zuständiges Gericht);
Art. 20.3 (Abtretung des Vertrags).
PRIVACY POLICY
Privacy Policy in italian language
1.URBANnext SA (hereinafter, “URBANnext” or “Data Controller”) recognises the importance of protecting the privacy and rights of the Users that use its Services. The Internet can be a very powerful tool for the circulation of personal data; therefore, URBANnext commits to respecting the rules of protection and security of personal data in order to guarantee the Users secure, controlled and private access to the network. This Privacy Policy may be modified in the future in order to ensure its continued compliance with all the regulations in force, in the event of their amendment or updating, as well as in order to adapt its content to changes in the purposes and methods for processing data by the Data Controller. Users are asked to carefully read the rules that URBANnext applies in order to collect and process personal data and to continue to provide a satisfactory Service. This Privacy Policy, which complies with the rules on the protection of personal data, describes the methods applied by the Data Controller to manage and process the personal data of: (I) Users that download URBI; (ii) Users that use the www.urbi.co website; (iii) Users that use the URBI Services.
(A) GENERAL INFORMATION
In accordance with the Federal Law of 19 June 1992 on the protection of data (LPD) and Art. 13 of Regulation 679/2016 (EU) (“GDPR”) regarding the protection of personal data, Users are informed that their personal data is stored and processed by URBANnext according to the methods and for the purposes listed below, in conformity with the methods and purposes permitted by the LPD and GDPR, where applicable. We use various technologies to collect information from your device and on your activities on our Services. URBANnext obtains the information supplied when the application is downloaded. Furthermore, URBANnext can collect some information automatically including, by way of example but not limitation, the type of mobile device being used, the unique ID of the device, the IP address of your mobile device, the mobile operating system, the type of mobile browser being used, and information on how the URBI Services are used. Based on your specific and express consent, the application can collect information on the position of the mobile device and use it to supply some of our on-demand information Services.
URBANnext does not require personal information to be entered in order to conduct a search on our application. URBANnext can collect personal information when our on-demand Services are used, or when the User registers with a Service Supplier or for our newsletter.
In order to allow a User to access the Mobility Services of a third-party Supplier through URBI, URBANnext asks the User for certain data which is sent to the Suppliers, who will process it as independent data controllers. The personal data includes, by way of example but not limitation: name, address, age, nationality, select information on an identity document or driving licence, payment information, password, PIN, etc. This data is processed confidentially and stored securely, and is only transmitted to the Suppliers of Mobility Services if the User asks URBANnext to access those Services through URBI. The communication of that data to the Suppliers is necessary to satisfy the User’s request, and without it, URBANnext is not able to provide the URBI Service requested.
We remind the User that URBANnext is a separate entity from the Suppliers of Mobility Services and should not be confused with them, as clarified in the Conditions of Use for the urbi.co site and the URBI application. URBANnext is not a representative of the Suppliers and does not act on their behalf in the collection of the User’s personal data. As such, the personal data collected independently by URBANnext to allow the User to access the Mobility Services, including the login credentials relative to accounts with the Suppliers of the aforementioned Services, will be processed by URBANnext exclusively in the interests of the User and in order to carry out their requests.
B) PURPOSES AND LEGAL BASIS OF THE PROCESSING
URBANnext uses personal data for the following purposes:
1) To fulfil the requests of the User and execute the contract concluded between them and URBANnext.
For this purpose, the Data Controller can, at the request of the User, allow them to book, register, buy or pay for the Mobility Services offered by the Third-Party Suppliers; the booking of those mobility Services requires the User to enter their authentication credentials pertaining to the account activated with the Supplier of the Mobility Service selected on each occasion; those credentials will be stored on the User’s device, following the application of adequate security measures by the Data Controller.
The provision of the services may also require the sending of service messages and communications, devoid of advertising content, via e-mail, SMS/MMS/USSD or notification within the mobile application. These messages are considered part of the URBI Services and therefore it may not be possible to disable receipt of them.
The newsletter sent at the request of the User is also included in the services.
As regards the purposes listed above, URBANnext may process all the categories of personal data indicated in the paragraph A) above.
Moreover, personal data which refers to Users can also be processed in order to satisfy their requests, in particular for managing the receipt of spontaneous applications sent through the special “JOBS” section on the website. In that case, URBANnext acquires the applicant’s e-mail address and possibly the personal data included in their curriculum vitae, including the first and last names, address of residence, date and place of birth, educational qualifications and work experience of the interested party.
The legal basis for the processing listed above is the fulfilment of the User’s requests and the execution of a contract which the User is party to.
2) With their explicit consent, the User can receive, via e-mail, in-app messages, post, social networks, SMS or MMS, communications and notices of a promotional and commercial nature sent by URBANnext and regarding URBI Services and/or the Mobility Services offered by the Suppliers.
To this end, the Data Controller will use the User's contact information.
The legal basis for the aforementioned processing is the User's consent.
The User can always revoke the consent provided for the receipt of communications of a promotional and commercial nature.
3) Lastly, the data may be processed to fulfil a legal obligation to which the Data Controller is subject or to allow URBANnext to defend its rights in court or, in any event, in the appropriate fora.
To this end, only the data necessary in relation to the fulfilment of URBANnext’s legal obligations or defence of its rights will be processed.
The data may be stored and processed anonymously to perform statistical analyses on the use of the URBI Services.
C) PROCESSING METHODS AND SCOPE OF CIRCULATION OF THE DATA
Users’ personal data will be processed by hand or by electronic means which guarantee, as regards the purposes for which the data is communicated and collected, the security and confidentiality of the data, for the time strictly necessary to achieve the purposes for collecting it. The data will be processed at the registered and executive offices of the Data Controller and on Cloud servers, as well as at the offices of third parties to whom it may be transmitted for the achievement of the aforementioned purposes. The Data Controller will ensure that all the personal data provided will not be disclosed and that it will be processed in such a manner as to guarantee its security and confidentiality, by preventing unauthorised access to it.
We limit access to your personal information to the employees of the company and/or duly authorised partners who assist the Data Controller in the following areas of activity: administration, legal affairs, customer care, management of the computer systems, including the company network and its relative hardware/software.
URBANnext keeps the information stored in its systems, including the Cloud servers supplied by third parties, and adopts measures to protect the personal information from loss, abuse, unauthorised access or disclosure.
If the legal prerequisites apply, the subjects who process personal data on behalf of the Data Controller will be appointed Data Processing Managers in advance pursuant to Article 28 of the GDPR. The parties concerned can always request the up-to-date list of the Data Processing Managers appointed by the Data Controller on each occasion.
D) RIGHTS OF THE INTERESTED PARTY
By sending a written request to the Data Controller, the User can: (i) obtain confirmation from the Data Controller as to whether or not any personal data exists; (ii) obtain information regarding the origin of their data, the purposes and methods of the processing of the data and the logic applied when the data is processed with electronic instruments; (iii) obtain the details of the Data Controller and the Data Processing Managers, if present; (iv) obtain information regarding the subjects or categories of subjects to whom the personal data may be communicated or who may come into contact with it as designated representatives in a country of the European Union, or their managers or employees; (v) obtain the deletion, transformation into an anonymous format or blocking of the data processed in violation of the law, as well as the updating, correction or, if interested, supplementation of their data and (vi) obtain a certification that the operations referred to in point (v) have been made known, including with regard to their content, to those to whom the data was communicated or disclosed, unless that proves to be impossible or entails a use of means which is manifestly disproportionate with the right being protected; (vii) object to the processing of the data, in whole or in part, for legitimate reasons; (viii) revoke their consent, previously provided, for the processing of their personal data; (ix) object to the processing of their data for the purpose of sending advertising or sales material. Furthermore, pursuant to the GDPR, if applicable, the User also has the right to receive their personal data in a structured format and to have it transferred to a different controller, if technically feasible.
The aforementioned requests must be sent to the URBANnext SA email address - info@urbi.co . By sending an explicit written request via email, the User can also obtain the correction of all incorrect or inaccurate personal data or have it deleted to the extent permitted by law. The User can also easily stop the collection of information by URBANnext by uninstalling the application. It is possible to use the standard uninstallation processes available as part of your mobile device or through the mobile or network application store.
The User may file a complaint with the relevant Supervisory Authority regarding data protection.
E) RETENTION TIME OF THE DATA
We will keep your personal data for the entire time that URBI is being used and for a reasonable period of time after its uninstallation, considering the ordinary prescribed deadline of the rights which could arise from the execution of the contract or in any event from any contact between the User and URBANnext. With particular reference to the personal data of applicants, we specify that it will be stored for 12 months following the receipt of the application. After that time, it will be definitively deleted. If you wish to have the personal information that you provided us with in the application removed, contact us at the address info@urbi.co and we will answer you within a reasonable period of time. Please note that some or all of the personal data may be required for the proper provision of URBI Services.
F) INFORMATION ON THE DATA CONTROLLER
URBANnext has appointed for processing activities, carried out in accordance with the GDPR, a Representative of the Data Controller in the person of Mr Marco Cavone, who serves as contact person, in addition to or as a replacement for the Data Controller, for the Supervisory Authorities and the parties concerned for all questions pertaining to the processing activities performed. The Representative of the Data Controller may be contacted as follows:
Representative of the Data Controller c/o URBANnext SA, Vicolo de’ Calvi 2, 6830 - Chiasso - Switzerland Email: privacy@urbi.co
Furthermore, URBANnext has identified and appointed a Data Protection Officer who can be contacted at the following address: Data Protection Officer (DPO) c/o URBANnext SA
Vicolo de' Calvi 2, 6830 – Chiasso - Switzerland Email: dpo@telepass.com
G) COOKIE POLICY
When you access or use URBI or the urbi.co site we can store information in cookies as follows:
a. customisation or technical cookies used to facilitate the browsing of the site, to store the options that you have selected on our website and provide more customised features.
B. Cookies for statistical purposes and to measure traffic: these cookies collect information on the use of the website, the pages visited and possible errors which may occur during browsing. We use the cookies to recognise the source of your visit to our site. These cookies do not collect information that can identify the User. All the information is collected anonymously and used to contribute to improving the operation of the website. As such, these cookies do not contain personal data. In certain cases, some of these cookies are managed on our behalf by third parties, so-called third-party cookies, including Google Analytics. These subjects are not authorised to use them for purposes other than those mentioned above. In order to obtain further information regarding the activities carried out by Google Analytics, you can click on the
following link
.
Most web browsers and mobile devices automatically accept cookies but, if you prefer, it is possible to block cookies by activating the setting on the device which allows you to refuse all or some of them (for example, it is possible to selectively block third-party cookies only). Please note, however, that by blocking some or all of the cookies, your browsing experience on the site and/or some features of the URBI Services may be compromised or suboptimal.
By continuing to use any one of our Services, you consent to the use of cookies as described.
DELETE MY ACCOUNT
Enter here the phone number you have verified on URBI. If you have verified your driving license, we will delete it.
Please proceed and delete independently your payment methods by going in the App 'Payment' section
Phone number verified on URBI
Please tell us the reason of your request (optional)
Send request of account deletion